Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
Number of Reviews
42

Author
Jason Overbeck
I always react more to films which contain endless imagination and
thought.  A movie like Dark City, that roars by you with images you have
never seen or dreamt, like experiences David Lynches paintings.  People
call this a comic book movie but that is nly part true.  This film is
detailed and enigmatic enough to make a great comic book but few comic
artists have as much energy as is shown in this film, one of the years
best.
A man wakes up finds a dead prostitute and soon discovers the dark side
of the world.  He encounters the Strangers a bread of aliens (I suppose)
who live under the surface of everyday life and conduct experiments on
humans whiule they cause us to sleep.
The Strangers will always be remembered as a true horrific detail,
almost like extras from a Marilyn Manson concert.  The are tall, looming
figures who wear all black and have dead, pale skin hugging their
bones.  It seems that movie dreams are never like dreams that real
humans might have, but those Strangers are creepy, and look as though
they walked out of my nightmares and onto thbig screen.
I have neglected much of the movie other than the look and that is a
shame.  We get good work from William Hurt, Rufus Sewel and Keifer
Sutherland.  The plot is also genious with ticks of sci-fi, film noir,
and horror.  The end scenes ae masterpieces in there own right.  When we
finally see what we inhabit, something comes over us, allowing us to
question theworld that we know and the peoples words we take on it.  It
may sound like I'm nuts, and I am - about this film.  Great work from
the director of the under-rated THE CROW Alex Prowles.

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) There seem to be two reactions to DARK CITY. You either
love it or you are unimpressed. Count me as a "love it." 
As good as THE CROW and SPAWN are, DARK CITY is better. Where the former two
have a specific comic-book following, the latter is an original work with
the potential for broader appeal. It has a similar look to the others, but
DARK CITY is much more thoughtful and much less violent. 
Not clever or complex, the story is still fascinating, like a selection from
the Twilight Zone. A man (Rufus Sewell) is awakened in his bathtub by a man
with a syringe. Surprised, the attacker runs off. The dazed man gets out of
the tub and finds a woman's body in the room. A mysterious caller warns him
to leave the apartment immediately, so he packs some clothes and leaves,
never sure why he's leaving or what he's fleeing. 
Ghoulish figures in long coats recognize the man and chase him through the
dark city, hounding him like figures in a nightmare. An odd blast of
willpower allows the man to dream himself free from his pursuers long enough
to check his I.D. The amnesiac learns that he is not dreaming and that his
name is John Murdoch. Now if only he could remember the rest of his life.... 
DARK CITY is good on many levels. First, the look of the movie is excellent.
Give credit to production designers George Liddle and Patrick Tatopolous for
creating a coherent look from diverse elements. There are visual elements
from the American 1920s-60s, mixed with Dickens-era urban industrial
elements. It is all pulled together in a sad, dark look reminiscent of the
diner in Edward Hopper's painting, NIGHTHAWKS. 
Proyas' use of models gives an appropriately eerie unreality to the film's
world (for not only does the AUDIENCE see the city a model, but so do the
ghouls). The look is like a cross between Tim Burton's BATMAN and the bleak
animation of the Brothers Quay. 
Second, the editing of the film is good. The pacing is on track, and the
plot is revealed, the "amnesia" explained, in satisfying increments. Also,
the stylized editing WITHIN each scene gives the movie a tense, caffeinated
look. 
Third, the special effects are well used. They look good, but more
importantly, the right effects are used for the right job. One example
stands out in my mind: the coated figures who haunt the city can attack
telekinetically. A simple ripple effect is used. A more showy effect could
have been chosen, but then it would have just been gratuitous. Restraint was
shown where necessary, letting the more critical effects look more impressive. 
Finally, like GATTACA, DARK CITY spends a just a little effort striving for
mythical significance. Unlike GATTACA, the story is just open-ended and
non-literal enough to be successful. John Murdoch's recovery from amnesia is
tied to the passing of the night, and the hopeful coming of the dawn. His
struggle with amnesia is both figuratively and literally the struggle of all
mankind (at least in his world). When we finally see the big picture of the
movie's world, it is as mysterious as the Iroquois image of the world being
carried on the back of a giant turtle. 
A few minor flaws keep me from giving this movie the same perfect score
Roger Ebert gave, but I do strongly recommend it, for its look, its pace,
its story, and its timelessness.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
David Wilcock
The director of The Crow (1994) returns with this happy epic, set in a
world where the sun is always shining and everyone is cheerful. Only
kidding. As you could guess by the title, Dark City is a dark,
depressive, but somewhat entertaining picture. Set sometime in the
future, the film begins when we see John Murdoch (Sewell) wake up with
no memory. He can't remember his wife Emma (Connely) or the murders
that he has been framed for. And when he encounters strange, tall
people wearing silly hats trying to kill him (called 'The Strangers'),
he tries to get answers. With the help of Dr. Scheriber (Sutherland)
he tries to work out what the hell is going on. Hot on his tail on
this time is world weary cop Inspector Frank Bumstead (Hurt.)
Despite the dark setting, and the depressive mood the picture has,
Dark City is entertaining. The first thing that makes the film fun is
the cast. Director Alex Proyas has managed to assemble a pretty good
cast for what is essentially a very silly sci-fi movie. Rufus Sewell
does a good job looking confused, and also does the action scenes all
right aswell. Sutherland appears to be having fun as the doctor, even
if he is overacting just a little.  His delivery of his lines really
started to annoy me, though. (He pauses every two words.) More
worringly, he's looking more like his father every day. Connelly fine
in her role, although it dosen't require much. Her singing voice, by
the way, is Anita Kelsey, so don't expect any Connelly hits in the
chart's any time soon. William Hurt is not bad, even though he dosen't
really appear to be trying. Also popping up is Ian Richardson and
Richard O'Brian as two of The Strangers. Both are good english actors,
and watching them dress up in the most stupid costumes, blurting out
lines which a B movie screenwriter would be proud of is actually quite
amusing (if you're British, that is.) Then again, O'Brien dressed up
stupid in The Rocky Horror Picture Show (1975) so looking silly is no
stranger to him.
Like The Crow, the film is directed like a music video with a large
budget.  Proyas uses fast cuts, quick zooms and a dance soundtrack to
great effect, as they manage (along with the acting) to drown out the
poor dialogue (written by Lem Dobbs, David S. Goyer and Proyas
himself.) The fast paced directing helps the movie bound along. The
dialogue just slows it down. It's clumsy, stupid, and in the end, just
boring.
The best thing about Dark City, however, is the look of the film. The
city is impressive, it's look the place The Crow (and Deckard from
Bladerunner, 1982) would live. The special effects are also
impressive, especially the ones in the overblown finale. Dark City is
a definite case of style of content. If you get bored of the movie,
just sit back and enjoy the great scenery, the great directing, and
the soundtrack. This things alone probably make Dark City worth
watching. It may not be the best film of the year, but Dark City is
worth watching, and is ultimately just good fun.  
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Author
Chris T. Dias
STARRING: Rufus Sewell, William Hurt, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer
Connelly, Richard O'Brien WRITTEN BY: Alex Proyas, Lem Dobbs and David
S. Goyer DIRECTED BY: Alex Proyas.
 Dark City is a great visionary achievement, a film so original and
exciting, it stirred my imagination like no movie has in a long time.
It opens with a narration by Dr.  Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland) who
tells of a dying race known only as The Strangers.  They came down
from a distant world to examine humanity.  Their experiment and their
subjects inhabit a city of rumbling elevated streamlined trains, dank
flophouses, scurrying crowds and store windows.  A city of night and
shadows, but it goes far beyond "Batman" in a richness of ominous,
stylized sets, streets, skylines and cityscapes.  For once a movie
city equals any we could picture in our minds.  A true clash of
futuristic style with a gothic metropolis thrown into the soup.  This
city can't exist in reality...unless it is not reality.
 Here, the sun never rises and midnight falls every 12 hours.  When
the clock strikes twelve, everyone sleeps, and the Strangers emerge.
They run their experiment, change things, and sink back into the
depths to observe.  The people have no idea.  They awake and continue
their lives, oblivious...until something goes wrong.
 On occasion, a person awakes during this frozen time.  They learn the
truth that something bizarre occurs in this town, and they start
asking questions.  One such person is John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) who
awakens in a strange bathtub beneath a swinging ceiling lamp, to
blood, fear and guilt. The telephone rings; it is Dr.  Schreber
(Kiefer Sutherland), gasping out two or three words at a time, as if
the need to speak is all that gives him breath. He warns Murdoch to
flee, and indeed three Strangers are in the corridor, coming for him.
There is a dead girl at his feet.  Did he commit this crime?  If he is
an evil man, why did he take a moment to save a dying fish?
 He flees.  Without any knowledge of who he is, John wanders through
the town, trying to piece together his past.  He remembers the woman
he loves, or loved--his wife, Emma (Jennifer Connelly), who is a torch
singer with sad eyes and wounded lips. And he remembers ... Shell
Beach?  Where was that? He sees it on a billboard and old longings
stir.
 On top of the billboard, he is attacked by a group Strangers.  They
are as confused as he is.  Why isn't he sleeping like the rest?  The
answer shocks them all, he might be developing their power...the
ability to "tune"-the art of altering matter at its basic level.  This
ability is revealed in its most shocking form when midnight strikes
again and John witnesses the populace falling into comas.  What is
more shocking is how the town changes.  Buildings grow and melt away.
Rooms expand.  A couple in the ghetto is dressed in nice clothes, the
building mutates from a run down apartment block into a mansion.  To
finalize the picture, the couple and anyone related have their
memories implanted by good doctor Shreber.
 John joins with his wife for the search for the truth.  But more than
the Stranger's pursue him.  Lest we forget that Robert was found in a
room with a dead girl.  Apparently this could by his sixth victim.  Is
he a murderer or has he been set up?  The investigator on the case is
new to this precinct, Inspector Bumstead (William Hurt).  He replaces
his predecessor, who apparently, went mad.
 The Strangers have gotten nervous.  To help hunt down Murdoch, one of
their own, Mr. Hand (Richard O'Brien)-They all have names like that.
Their leader is known as Mr.  Book-has Murdoch's own memories
implanted in him so he can think like the human subject.
 Murdoch's problem is that he has no way of knowing if his memories
are real, if his past actually happened, if the women he loves ever
existed.  Those who offer to help him cannot be trusted.  Even his
enemies may not be real. The movie teasingly explores the question
that babies first ask in peek-a-boo: When I can't see you, are you
there?  It's through that game that we learn the difference between
ourselves and others.  But what if we're not there, either?
 Dark City is a glorious marriage of existential dread and slam-bang
action.  From the start, I got somewhat disillusioned from a couple
less-than-spectacular model shots of the city.  The movie seems loose
in its first act.  Only when certain questions are answered about
setting, do we start to fully understand what is going on.  Luckily,
this happens almost immediately...but the story does not open itself
up.  In fact there were surprises I had no idea were coming until the
very end.
 It seems that every year, a low budget sci-fi film comes out that
sweeps the critics.  Somehow, these low-budget flicks aren't seen by
many people.  They slip into obscurity...that is, until word of mouth
gets out and it becomes a cult hit.  Richard O'Brien should be aware
of cult hits (those who know what I am talking about can smirk an
little smirk and continue).
 Two years ago, it was The Arrival, a brilliant film by writer
extrodinaire', David Twohy.  It opened between Mission: Impossible and
Twister and promptly got killed.  Last year, it was Gattaca.  Now, it
is Dark City...too bad there is usually only one of these per year.
Dark City came out too quickly.  For one reason is the little boat
movie that never sinks.
 Dark City is one of the most original science fiction films I have
ever seen.  Please note I use the word "film."  This is the kind of
fiction we see often in novels and comics.  They always have a real
sense of original energy that so many movies lack.  In fact, upon
looking back, there were many elements in this film I that I
remembered in books like Ringworld, comics like Akira, and even the
Final Fantasy computer game.
 However, Dark City plays above them all with a fantastic story.  It
never lays it out in your lap, but unlike some other films, it does
make sense.  So many movies are so confusing, you have to think about
it for hours just put your mind at ease at the plot holes.  Dark City
makes you think but explains just enough that you understand what is
happening.
 The single best part of this film is the ending...It has one.  So
many high budget films of the past year have no third act (see Men in
Black and The Fifth Element).  The energy of the last act is enough
for two films.  Everything comes together with a great irony and
fantastic apocalyptic ballet that made me doubt the budget of this
film.  Alex Proyas is a stylistic director with a great imagination.
I was glued at the visuals of this movie.  The set designs are
unbelievable (reminiscent of Terry Gilliam's Brazil) and the music was
amazingly epic.
 The effects got better and better.  The sequences in so many films
can be switched with other films.  Take the cable car chase from
Metro, The Rock, and Heaven's Prisoners and juggle them around...you
wouldn't tell them apart.  Here, the sequences are very unique.  In
one amazing scene, the Stranger's are tuning the city.  Buildings rise
and fall.  Towers assemble in seconds.  Murdoch is pursued by flying
strangers.  After leaping across rooftops that move up and down, he
finds himself trapped between two buildings which are colliding.  He
then runs through one, out a door, only discover the rest of the
building hasn't been constructed yet.  He hangs for dear life and
saves himself by jumping on a chimney that rises up beside him.  Just
imagine it.
 Dark City is a film that begs repeat viewing because of the amount of
intelligence it shows.  There is so much to see and think about that I
walked away constantly jabbering about its good points.  Dark City is
a great film and I plead to everyone to consider it as an alternative
to the Titanic juggernaut.
GREAT POINTS: SET DESIGN IMAGINATION STORY
DEMOGRAPHIC: There is little language and little blood.  We have
nudity and some dead bodies.  The one thing that will turn off younger
viewers is the same complaint about LA Confidential (complaint?!).
The story is not simple and most kids won't have the foggiest what is
happening.  Dark City is a movie of intelligence.  Unless you have
some, keep away.
-- --- Chris T. Dias --- "The man who runs with scissors."

Author
Steve Kong
Some movies create two different worlds: one for the trailer and one for
the actual movie.  The trailer for Dark City was mysterious.  It induced a
feeling of awe for what the movie is about.  The visuals, the loud audio,
and the mysterious text all worked together to create this feeling of awe.
Does the movie live up to the trailer?  And does Dark City carry through
with the incredible world that we glimpsed in the trailer?
Alex Proyas is best known for the dark world and mood that he created for
Brandon Lee's last film, The Crow.  But, his work was overshadowed by the
tragic death of Lee.  This time with Dark City, Proyas is let loose to work
and create a world that truly lives up to its name.  Dark City is a
luscious looking film-and even that is an understatement.  The world that
Proyas puts up on the screen is a strange mix of Ridley Scott's Blade
Runner and Tim Burton's Batman world.  Though not set in a technological
wonder like Blade Runner the world does overshadow Batman's world.  I think
that this is what Burton was aiming for with his original Batman but was
unable to create it.
The movie is not all visuals, though.  It opens with a dreary monologue by
a Dr. Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland) which explains about "The Strangers."
It seems that The Strangers are a group of aliens who have taken beings
from a world-though never specified as the Earth-and offloaded them onto
the Strangers' world.  Here on the Strangers' world the humans become
specimens for the Strangers' experiments.  The Strangers are a slowly dying
race and that are looking to beat their mortality and they think that they
can find it in the human soul.  We then are introduced to the main
character of the film, John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell), who wakes up in a motel
room with a dead prostitute next to his bed.  Murdoch looks around the room
for clues to what happened and finds a few things.
Murdoch,though, has had a complete loss of memory and is unsure if he is a
killer or not.  Inspector Bumstead (William Hurt) is assigned to the case
and is on the trailer of Murdoch.  Murdoch tries to find out who he really
is and follows a trail of clues which leads him to many things, including
his wife, Emma (Jennifer Connelly).  We question if Murdoch is really the
killer as we discover more about how Dark City really operates.
It seems that in the Dark City there is no day time; it's a continuous
night, and for a good reason.
The script for Dark City comes from a story by Proyas and is written by
Proyas, Lem Dobbs and David S. Goyer.  It introduces a lot of interesting
ideas for the audience to think about.  Dark City questions one's real
identity and one's reality.  Who are we really?  What makes us who we are?
Is this all real?  The problem with the script is that it tries overly hard
to explain every idea introduced and leaves nothing for the audience to
think about.  Every time something mysterious, awe inspiring, or
interesting is introduced a character stops everything and gives a long
monologue explaining what it is about.  The characters are too talky.  I'm
a big X-Files fan and for a good reason, the writers for The X-Files know
that not everything needs to be explained, that some things are best left
to the audience's imagination and left for the audience to chew over.  It
is this ambiguity of The X-Files that makes it so enjoyable.  Had Proyas,
Dobbs, and Goyer watched a few more episodes of The X-Files they would have
learned the same.  Proyas, Dobbs, and Goyer leave nothing to the audience's
imagination- everything is clearly explained and nothing is left in the dark.
Dark City's visuals are stunning.  The city that these characters live in
is incredible with its tall skyline, the dark ominous buildings, the retro
look of everything, and the clear lack of lighting.  It creates an
atmosphere for the movie that comes very close to overshadowing the story
itself.  The one thing, and this could be seen as a bad thing, that subdues
the overly large presence of the city is Proyas' editing.  Proyas edits the
film like a music video or a movie trailer.  Everything comes in quick
flashes and there are little or no steady shots for us to really see how
characters are reacting.  Also there are no shots that let us fully take in
the city and atmosphere that Proyas created for the movie.  The editing of
the film feels like a comic book-flashing from one panel to the next, not
taking anytime to slow down and let the audience look at the visuals.
The performances by the cast are all about equal.  They come close to being
a bit too bland, though they never slip into that territory.  Rufus Sewell,
who you can also catch in the current Dangerous Beauty, fares a little
better than the rest of the cast.
Dark City is one of those films that draws you in even though it has some
outstanding flaws.  I enjoyed Dark City and all the ideas that it
generates, but I enjoyed the visuals the most.  Dark City is not a "style
over substance" film.  Actually, it can be argued that Dark City has a
little more substance than it really needs.  I recommend the film, though
it doesn't create enough to warrant a Don't Miss nod.

Author
Alex Ioshpe
John Murdoch (Sewell) awakens alone in a strange hotel to find that he is
wanted for a series of brutal murders. The problem is that he can't remember
whether he committed the murders or not. In fact, most of his memories have
completely vanished, and for one brief moment, he is convinced that he has
gone stark raving mad. Pursued by Detective Bumstead (Hurt), Murdoch seeks
to unravel the twisted riddle of his identity. As he edges closer to solving
the mystery, he stumbles upon a fiendish underworld controlled by a group of
ominous beings collectively known as The Strangers . These shadow-like,
soulless creatures are on a quest to emulate humanity. They control Dark
City, freezing  time every night to rearrange the skyline and warp every
resident's mind to find out what  makes us "tick". These gothic figures
possess the ability to alter people's perceptions, by changing their
memories -- a process known as Tuning. Through an evolutionary anomaly,
Murdoch is also imbued with this power and thus, he alone is able to resist
The Stangers' control over his mind.. And for that, he must be destroyed.
With the help of the inscrutable Doctor Schreber (Sutherland), Murdoch is
able to stay a step ahead of his adversaries while he slowly pieces together
the labyrinthine puzzle of his past -- his bittersweet childhood, his love
for his estranged wife Emma (Connelly) and the key to a hideous series of
murders which he is suspected of committing.
Eternal night, strange skyscrapers that morph from the ground, while the
unknowing citizens get their memories changed every 24 hours. This is a
surreal, bizarre and effectively paranoid sci-fi thriller that will please
the neo-noir fans. Unlike most of the films of its genre, "Dark City" does
not have any action sequences or endless gunfights. It is more like a dark a
nd moody meditation. What makes us human? What is individuality? Is it
simply a collection of memories that make us what we are? Will a man that
has got memories of a killer continue the horrifying practice? Or is it
something deeper, something you can not change, take or label? Is that what
we call soul?
In a film like this, atmosphere is the key. Alex Proyas understands that.
Directing with as little light as possible and using only the shades of
gray, black and dark green, he manages to create a cold and unfriendly
world, which is a bizarre mixture of countless time periods and ages - a
world of eternal night, lit up only by the colorful memories. This world is
more like a zoo - a laboratory where it is we who are being researched by a
superior and far more advanced race.
Visually the film is remarkable, presenting a graceful cinematography,
gothic architecture, '50s costumes, interesting art direction and a dose of
impressive special effects. The acting is also a key factor and it is
nothing more than acceptable, although it is impossible to call any of the
performances spectacular. Regrettably the characters in "Dark City" are not
very developed and there are some disturbing holes in the plot, that some
will find disturbing. After a spectacular and completely unexpected
revelation that lifts the film to new hight, the finale that follows is
rather disappointing, simplified and almost alienated from the rest of the
picture.
This film has received a rather cold welcome from the critics and was
underrated and overseen for no reason. Several failures during these 100
minutes, prevent me from giving this film a top mark. However, this is truly
a thrilling and inspiring production, that will probably stand as an example
of a good science fiction film in the years that come.
Written by Alex Ioshpe (C) 1998 (ioshpe@online.no)

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Alex Proyas
Cast:  Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, Richard
O'Brien, Ian Richardson, William Hurt
Screenplay:  Alex Proyas, Lem Dobbs, David S. Goyer         
Producers:  Andrew mason, Alex Proyas
Runtime:  104 min.
US Distribution:  New Line Cinema
Rated R:  Violence, nudity, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        Dark City is an imaginative, entertaining pre-cult film--intense and
visually absorbing.  It harnesses a lot of new ideas, some of which are
profound, and others absurd, but all are compelling.  I say "pre-cult"
because I imagine that Dark City, like Blade Runner and 2001, will
probably be a cult hit in a few years, and will be remembered in the
long run as great entertainment.  
        Rufus Sewell (whom I've only seen as Fortinbras in Branagh's Hamlet)
plays John Murdoch, a man who mysteriously wakes up in a bathtub and
doesn't remember who he is.  He receives a strange phone call from an
alleged doctor (Kiefer Sutherland) who tells him that he has no memory,
and that there are people after him.  John quickly makes it out of the
hotel and onto the streets of the Dark City in which he lives.  
        His objective now is to find out who he is; he finds out that he has a
wife, Emma (Jennifer Connelly), and that she hasn't seen him in three
weeks.  Not long after this, he finds that he is wanted for the murders
of six women, though the detective in charge of that case (William Hurt)
isn't sure what to believe.  John, with the help of the doctor, is
finally allowed to know about an experiment of an extraterrestrial race
called the Strangers.  The Strangers' purpose is to understand the
effects of memories on human beings.  The Strangers have a power, called
"tuning," that allows them to alter physical reality.  Their interest in
John lies in the fact that he also has this power.
        For the first half of the film, I was impressed with the visual
presentation of Dark City, but completely disengaged from the story and
the characters.  I realized, though, that this is because even John
doesn't know who he is, and for us to sympathize with him, it takes more
time as he uncovers the details of his own past.  Later in the film,
there are scenes between John and Emma that are extremely moving, like a
moment in which he is talking to her through a pane of glass in a police
station.
        In fact, by the end of the film, I was impressed with how well all of
the characters are developed.  Sewell does a great job in the lead, and
with this film he proves that he is a solid leading man.  The beautiful
Connelly is as luminous as ever, and she truly shines in more than one
moment here.  Hurt is extremely dark and brooding (he has a lot of
screen time, but I think he opens his mouth twice); and Sutherland,
although he overacts (Peter Lorre syndrome, I think), he still manages
to be likable in his role.  Good characters is a very good thing in a
film that exists primarily to showcase masterful sets and special
effects:  it makes our enjoyment of the film effortless and smooth.
        Proyas has done a great job with the look of this film.  The city
itself is a deep and complex setting, just as interesting as any of the
human characters in the film.  Proyas, who also directed the visually
powerful The Crow, takes elements from other films such as Batman, Blade
Runner, and his own previous film, and manages to make a new and unusual
setting by extending on these concepts.  Some of the sets here--like the
Strangers' meeting place--are truly breathtaking.  And in the final
scenes we get to see the City from afar, and it is quite a sight.
        I do have issues with the science depicted here, though.  I'd like to
see what studies fuelled Proyas' ideas revolving around the memory, but
for some reason I don't think that our memories come in the form of
liquid.  There's also more than one instance later in the film that
doesn't treat basic concepts of physics with respect.  
        But, when all is considered, this is a fantasy film, and these are
allowed to extend beyond common cinematic boundaries from time to time. 
Dark City is a good, original film that I found very refreshing, given
the level of rehashed garbage that we've already gotten this year. 
Proyas--with his visionary, moving picture-style of direction--should
have a long life in the business.  

Author
Aaron Michaels
John Murdoch: Rufus Sewell
Inspector Frank Bumstead: William Hurt
Dr. Daniel Poe Schreber: Kiefer Sutherland
Emma Murdoch/Anna: Jennifer Connelly
Mr. Hand: Richard O'Brien
Directed by Alex Proyas. Written by Proyas, Lem Dobbs, & David S. Goyer.
Running time: 100 minutes. Rated R (for violence and nudity).
Dark City is a dark, dark movie. It deals with a group called the
Strangers who have taken over a city and are using the locals as
experiments. They have an ability to "tune" which causes people to sleep
and buildings to move. They imprint thoughts into people's brains to see
what makes them tick while they are asleep.
John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell), a young man who is your everyday guy, wakes
up the middle of being imprinted. His memory is lost. He stumbles around
and notices a dead prositute horribly murdered near him. How could he
have done this?
He gets a phone call from a excentric doctor Dr. Schreber (Keifer
Sutherland) telling him to get out the building because the Strangers
will find him. He travels around the city for the next 90 minutes being
chased by an Inspector Bumstead (William Hurt) and the Strangers lead by
a pale-faced man named Mr. Head (Richard O'Brien) while peacing together
the story.
Dark City is a technically well made film. Proyas along with
cinematographer Dariusz Wolski, composer Trevor Jones, and the art and
set direction teams have created a very interesting world for the
activities to exist in. Towering buildings and city streets are a marvel
to look at. The script by Proyas, Lem Dobbs, and David S. Goyer is also
good and features a new suprise constantly. It plays out like a dark
comic book that was made picture by picture into a movie.
The cast does a fine job with Sutherland and Hurt being the standouts.
Sutherland has always been a sub-par actor in my mind with has
villianous turns in The Lost Boys and Freeway but in this film he plays
a not good, but not bad guy very well. He seems to be having fun gasping
for air constantly
just to sputter out fast dialogue. Hurt has always been a good actor and
he is a great choice as the inspector due to his charm and intelligence.
Almost all films that use visual effects extensively overuse them and
use them for stupid reasons. CGI is almost always just used to create
beasts or fake looking stunts but in Dark City it is used correctly. It
adds to the film very well and is a must have. The "tuning" scenes
highlight the greatness of the technology.
I do have a complaint with the film though. Jennifer Connely has never
been a good actress. She always plays a girl who every guy goggles at
and seems to just be eye candy. In this film she plays Murdoch's
girlfriend and I didn't feel that she was a character. She wasn't
interesting even though she had to be to pull off the character. She
looks out of place in an science fiction film.
With my complaint aside, Dark City is one of the better science fiction
to come out of Hollywood (actually the film was shot in Australia) while
other films are just gory space pictures. Proyas continues his streak of
comic book scripts that are put to screen that he started with The Crow
and I am anticipating his next book on film.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The best thing -- in fact, the only good thing -- I can say about Dark
City is that it made me want to go see L.A. Confidential again.  Or go
rent Body Heat, to see William Hurt do some real noir.  Or even -- God
help me -- Palmetto.
Alex Proyas's new movie screams atmosphere.  I screamed, too, "Get me
out of this theater!"  New Line Cinema spent millions of dollars
creating the expressionistic film noir visuals and paying the actors,
and doesn't have any way to get it back.  I paid $4.25 for a matinee
screening and don't have any way to get my money back, either.
You'll hear a lot from other critics about the look and feel of this
movie.  I will admit that the cinematographers and costume designers and
set artists and CGI graphics geeks all worked hard to create a stunning,
nightmarish future world where it's always a late night in 1948,
complete with rotary phones and automats and fedoras. I've got news for
you fellows -- I don't care how hard you worked, or how visually
stunning this movie looks -- you wasted your time and mine, working on a
movie without a plot, without a clear sense of direction of where it
wanted to go, without a soul or a reason to care.
The movie starts out oh-so-promising.  John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) is
lying in a bathtub in the sort of seedy hotel that in real life, would
have been boarded up long ago.  There is a dead, mutilated prostitute in
the other room -- a surprise, as he has lost his memory.  The phone
rings:  it's a sinister-sounding man, claiming to be his doctor, telling
him to flee for his life.
All well and good, right?  Wrong.  Apparently, someone decided that the
audience was just a bit too dim to figure out the intricacies of the
plot.  (This is getting to be a popular assumption in Hollywood.)  So,
the actual beginning of the movie is not Sewell running for his life,
rather, it's a voice-over narration by the aforementioned doctor (Keifer
Sutherland) explaining exactly what is going on and who is responsible.
It's as though Sam the piano player had told us that Rick and Ilsa had
been getting it on in Paris in the first three minutes of Casablanca.
No, wait, that's not fair to Casablanca.  It's more like watching a new
plotline at the first of the show -- or if you want to know how I really
feel, having an off-screen narrator explain that Gilligan won't be
getting off the island in this episode.
>From here, the coherence of the plot goes down faster than (insert
Monica Lewinsky joke here).  The characters just wander around the city
aimlessly and bump into each other for no apparent reason, and that's
what moves the plot.  What we're left with is a string of unanswered
questions that don't make any sense.  We're given aliens with unlimited
omnipotent powers, yet they forget to use them at critical moments and
get themselves killed.  We're given a hero who can "tune" into these
same powers, yet he only uses them when it's convenient to the plot.
We're given a whole long list of loose ends that go nowhere
Usually, critics will say that an actor playing an underwritten part
"isn't given much to do."  In this movie, no one is given anything to
do.  Sewell is given the impossible role of a man who doesn't remember
anything, and plays it like... um... a man who doesn't remember
anything.  The aliens are tall, pasty-faced, and bald, and wear long
black cloaks and fedoras to remind us that they're evil -- and there's a
child alien as well, straight out of an Anne Rice novel.  Sutherland is
saddled with a limp, a twitchy eye, and a breathy accent to remind us
that he's in league with the aliens.
To its credit, Dark City boasts two impressive bits of casting.  William
Hurt is perfectly cast as the world-weary inspector charged with
catching the man who is murdering prostitutes all over the city.
Jennifer Connelly, playing Sewell's love interest, is given two
all-too-brief moments on screen as a lounge singer -- and turns in the
sexiest performace this side of Jessica Rabbit.  But instead of the
dogged policeman and the femme fatale given central treatment in the
script (the way they would be in any self-respecting noir movie) they're
almost tangiential to the plot, such as it is.
The problem with Dark City is this:  it's a bad science fiction movie
pretending to be film noir.  The essence of film noir isn't, as Proyas
seems to beleive, breathy dialogue or snap-brim fedoras or tall, bald
evil villains who would make Peter Lorre curl up in a corner.  Dark City
has not one bit of intrigue, moral ambiguity, suspense, or anything else
that keeps us coming back to the noir classics.
Dark City is like the intricately carved door that Kate Winslet floats
on in Titanic.  It's an exceptionlly well-made and intricately designed
piece of flotsam, sailing around and around the middle of the ocean,
going nowhere.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/

Author
Homer Yen
A man (Rufus Sewell) abruptly wakes up.  Blood trickles down his
forehead.  He sees a syringe on the floor.  He is noticeably
disoriented.   Everything seems strangely out of synch and we wonder
along with him what's going on.  He can only remember that his last
name is Murdoch but nothing else.   Suddenly, the phone rings, and he
is warned to leave immediately.  "They are already on their way," says
the mysterious voice on the other side urging him to get out.  As he
flees the building, he notices one incredibly strange thing. -- it
seems that time has stopped.  All movement has ceased right down to
the pendulums on a clock except for our man and those that are chasing
him.  Who are these people that are chasing Murdoch?  What makes
Murdoch special enabling him to stay 'awake' when everyone else
becomes frozen in time.  What is the secret of Dark City?
"Dark City" is a retro-futuristic noir thriller that is set in a place
of clouded memories, endless nights, and ever-changing landscapes.
The underground denizens are referred to as 'The Strangers'.
Ghoulishly pale and bald-headed, they possess telepathic powers and
come out at night like goblins to initiate their experiments on the
city and its residents.  At the stroke of 12, the Strangers initiate a
telepathic process called 'tuning' which enables them to alter reality
and stop time.  Murdoch, however, seems immune to this and in fact
seems to be developing powers that makes him stronger than the
Strangers.  To the Strangers, this is a threat that must be
eliminated.  To capture Murdoch, they come out to hunt him late at
night when they can stop time.  During the other parts of the day,
they wait for the police to capture him, for Murdoch is wanted for
questioning in connection with a murder case.  As the movie develops,
Murdoch soon regains more of his memory, and in order to further
understand the nature of the Strangers and the city itself, he seeks
help from his wife (Jennifer Connelly); the Inspector in charge of
capturing him (William Hurt); and an enigmatic psychologist that may
hold the key to his memory loss (Kiefer Sutherland).  
While we are entranced with Murdoch as he tries to unravel the
mystery, the greatest triumph of this movie is the city itself.
Gothic and impressive, it suggests an indistinct time period.  The
secrets within the city make her just as important a character as any
of the humans.  As a science-fiction piece, it plays with our
imagination and satiates our appetite for inventiveness.  The
cinematography is beautiful as scenes are filmed at strange angles and
in hallways, corridors and alleyways that connote an eerie sense of
claustrophobia.
As a drama, thriller and romantic vehicle, it sustains our interest
and unfolds slowly enough to pique our curiosity yet quickly enough to
satisfy our need to know.  Moreover, it is a visual experience that is
haunting yet captivating.  But without a doubt, it is destined to be
one of the most unique-looking films of this year.  With it's spooky
industrial soundtrack, stylish presentation, and nice pace, "Dark
City" is certainly worth visiting.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Dark City (1998)
Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, Richard O'Brien, Ian 
Richardson, William Hurt. Directed by Alex Proyas. 104 minutes.
Rated R, 3.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
What if you aren't who you think you are? What if your memories are 
manufactured? What if otherworldly beings slip into your mind while you 
sleep, changing your identity as casually as one changes TV stations? 
That's the premise of Alex Proyas' striking new sci-fi noir thriller. He 
calls it "Dark City." Mental health professionals might call it "Paranoia 
Helper." 
Using extremely quick edits, sensuous computer graphics, and a palette of 
blacks, browns and blues, with an occasional splash of red, Proyas ("The 
Crow") puts you smack in the middle of a nightmare from which you cannot 
awake. The story employs a fractured dream logic, although attentive 
viewers will have no problem following the narrative flow. 
You could spend hours listing all the film's reference points.  "Brazil," 
"Blade Runner," "Altered States," "Metropolis," "Twin Peaks," and "The 
Prisoner" spring to mind, but there are many other touch points. The 
bottom line, though, is that Proyas has crafted a vision distinctly his 
own. "Dark City" has an amazingly rich texture and an extraordinary sense 
of place. Even as the buildings themselves twist from one shape to 
another, you feel as if you could walk down their desolate halls. Despite 
periodic lapses into cheesiness, "Dark City" is memorable filmmaking, 
more an experience than simply a movie.  
It begins when John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) wakes up in the bathtub of a 
seedy hotel suite. There's a dead prostitute in the room, but he can't 
remember if he killed her. For that matter, he can't remember anything 
about his past. While desperately trying to collect himself, Murdoch 
receives a call from a Dr. Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland,) urging him to 
flee the room immediately. In short order, Murdoch learns that a lot of 
people are looking for him. Inspector Frank Bumstead (William Hurt) wants 
him in connection with a string of vicious murders. His wife Emma 
(Jennifer Connelly) wants to make amends for cheating on him. And the 
Strangers want him very badly. Bedecked in long overcoats as they 
silently fly through the night skies, the pallid bald pursuers look like 
the hellish spawn of Uncle Fester and Pinhead, filtered through a 
Magritte painting.
So who are the Strangers and what are they up to? It would be best to 
find out during the course of the story, but since Proyas spills the 
beans in an unnecessary voice-over at the beginning of the film, I'll 
recount them here. The Strangers are the last of an alien race, 
conducting experiments on humanity from their headquarters deep beneath 
the city. Possessed of a power called "tuning," they can stop time, make 
people fall asleep with the wave of a hand, and reshape physical reality 
through concentration alone. At the stroke of twelve every night (and 
it's always night,) they implant memories and identities in various 
citizens, then carefully watch the results.
But sometimes the implants don't go quite right, as evidenced by Murdoch. 
Further complicating the Strangers' agenda is the fact that Murdoch is 
also able to tune. Gradually, Murdoch changes from panicked victim to 
avenging warrior as he pursues vague memories of an idyllic place called 
Shell Beach, all while honing his newfound powers. Clearly it's just a 
matter of time before he confronts the aliens and dares them to "Go ahead,
 make my night."
Rufus Sewell handles Murdoch well, investing the character with just the 
right amounts of urgency and strength. Hurt and Connelly turn in sturdy 
enough performances, given the befuddled nature required of their 
characters. Richard O'Brien, who created "The Rocky Horror Picture Show" 
and played Riff-Raff, gives a stylish turn as Mr. Hand, lead hatchet man 
for the Strangers.
The oddest performance comes from Kiefer Sutherland, affecting a bizarre, 
quasi-Peter Lorre impression as Dr. Schreber. Sutherland says two...or 
three...words then he...pauses and...breathes then he...continues 
speaking. The halting, breathy speech style is just as annoying onscreen 
as it was in that sentence.
Performances and plot aside, "Dark City" is a feast for the eyes. The 
city has the worn look of New York in the 40s or 50s, with retro 
funkiness and art deco flourishes everywhere. Computer animated shots of 
the buildings morphing from one shape to another are dazzling, as are the 
scenes of the Strangers gliding through the air. The effects are 
occassionally cheesy, particularly when Murdoch has a literal battle of 
wills with head Stranger Mr. Book (Ian Richardson,) but with a vision as 
expansive as Proyas', the flubs are easy to overlook.
With it's roots firmly in the "Heavy Metal" school of adolescent 
trippiness, "Dark City" makes no groundbreaking statements, but that's 
fine. Proyas has taken a clever idea, added some phenomenal imagery and 
created one whale of an apocalyptic dreamscape. During a season where 
most movies look like photocopies of each other, "Dark City" is a most 
welcome diversion. 

Author
Richard Scheib
USA/Australia. 1998. Director/Story - Alex Proyas, Screenplay - Proyas, 
Lem Dobbs & David S. Goyer, Producers - Goyer & Andrew Mason, 
Photography - Dariusz Wolski, Music - Trevor Jones, Visual Effects - 
Mason, Mara Bryan & Arthur Windus, Digital Visual Effects - DFilm 
Services, Sydney, Model/Miniature Supervisor - Tom Davies, Special 
Effects Supervisor - Tad Price, Prosthetics - Bob McCarron, Production 
Design - George Liddle & Patrick Tatopoulos. Production Company - 
Mystery Clock/Dark City Productions/New Line Cinema.
Rufus Sewell (John Murdoch), Kiefer Sutherland (Dr Daniel Poe Schreber), 
William Hurt (Inspector Frank Bumstead), Jennifer Connelly (Emma 
Murdoch/Anna), Ian Richardson (Mr Book), Richard O'Brien (Mr Hand), John 
Bluthal (Karl Harris), Bruce Spence (Mr Wall), Colin Friels (Detective 
Walenski), Melissa George (May)
Plot: In a mysterious city where the sunlight never shines, John Murdoch 
wakes in a hotel room with no memory of who he is. He is pursued by 
police who suspect that he is responsible for a series of  killings of  
prostitutes; a creepy doctor who insists that he is insane; and 
mysterious aliens in black coats and fedoras who place the entire city 
to sleep on the stroke of midnight while they manipulate its fundamental 
structure. However Murdoch finds he is the only person who can not be 
made to sleep by the aliens and that he shares some of their 
reality-manipulating abilities. In his efforts to understand the 
situation, he comes to discover that the entire city is a vast 
laboratory being used in experiments by the aliens to reorder and 
transplant people's memories in an attempt to penetrate the secret of 
the human soul.
Forget about what Variety and a number of the other trained-monkey 
mainstream reviewers have said about 'Dark City' being confusing and 
hard to follow. I can say without any hesitation that this is one of the 
most conceptually audacious and best sf films I have seen in the last 
few years.
It is the second film of Alex Proyas, who made a striking debut with the 
darkly driven and nihilistic 'The Crow' in 1994. The film is clearly a 
very personal project of Proyas's - he also had a strong hand in the 
script - and marks him as one of the directors most worth keeping an eye 
on in future. It is a film that eludes any easy pigeonholing. It 
seemingly takes place in a world of self-conscious artifice that 
suggests a collision between 'Brazil' and 'The Maltese Falcon'. Here 
Proyas deliberately evokes film noir - everyone dresses in trench coats 
and hats, the women come across as slinky vamps, the cars are all period 
and the technology has a striking 1940s retro look. (The city was built 
entirely stagebound inside Australia's Movie World studios). But there 
is also a dystopian feel to it too - there are times the film is 
extraordinarily threatening -  a visit to a cafe where each item of food 
sits in a compartment of its own in a backlit glass case is striking. 
Proyas shoots it all in a beautiful, virtually monochrome lighting 
scheme that renders the city as permanent night-time - one where the 
recurrent vision of a sunlit, palm-shaded beach (even when it is 
revealed as only a faded mural) becomes an achingly palpable 
representation of all hope.
Of course in this noir world everything is far from normal. In an almost 
classical setup the hero wakes in a hotel room with complete amnesia and 
to find himself on the run from the police as a suspected killer. But 
then in the first of the film's wild spins finds he is immune to (and 
maybe even one of) a group of bald aliens beneath the city who on the 
stroke of midnight each night cause the populace to fall asleep while 
they rearrange the spatial geometry and the very fabric of reality 
within the city. After several wild (but completely logical) twists the 
hero makes a classical conceptual breakthrough to discover that the city 
is an experiment set up by the aliens to determine the nature of the 
human soul by manipulating and transplanting people's memories. One of 
the most emotionally powerful scenes in the film comes when he tries to 
explain to his wife that the memories of their marriage are entirely 
false and were only implanted the previous night, only to have her 
tearfully protest "But they can't be - I love you." An extraordinary 
film.


Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, 
      Richard O'Brien, Ian Richardson, William Hurt
Director: Alex Proyas
Producers: Andrew Mason and Alex Proyas
Screenplay: Alex Proyas and Lem Dobbs and David S. Goyer
Cinematography: Dariusz Wolski
Music: Trevor Jones
U.S. Distributor: New Line Cinema
     THE CROW will forever be remembered as the final performance of 
budding star Brandon Lee, who died as a result of a tragic behind-the-
scenes accident.  However, as intense as the hype associated with Lee's 
death was, it could not obscure the most impressive aspect of the 1994 
feature:  director Alex Proyas' startling, unforgettable vision.  It's 
rare for any film maker, whether a veteran or a newcomer, to create the 
kind of compelling, endlessly-fascinating environment that Proyas 
brought to the screen in THE CROW.  Now, with his follow-up movie, DARK 
CITY, the director incredibly manages to one-up himself.
     No movie can ever have too much atmosphere, and DARK CITY exudes it 
from every frame of celluloid.  Proyas' world isn't just a playground 
for his characters to romp in -- it's an ominous place where viewers can 
get lost.  We don't just coolly observe the bizarre, ever-changing 
skyline; we plunge into the city's benighted depths, following the 
protagonist as he explores the secrets of this grim place where the sun 
never shines.  DARK CITY has as stunning a visual texture as that of any 
movie that I've seen.  Line up the other recent candidates, which 
include Tim Burton's BATMAN, Ridley Scott's BLADE RUNNER, Jean-Pierre 
Jeunet and Marc Caro's DELICATESSAN and THE CITY OF LOST CHILDREN, and 
Terry Gilliam's BRAZIL, and DARK CITY equals or bests them all.  
Visually, this film isn't just impressive, it's a tour de force.
     Thankfully, DARK CITY doesn't have an "all style, no substance" 
problem, either, because there's a mind-challenging story to go along 
with the eye candy.  Proyas hasn't written this film for the passive 
viewer.  To become involved in DARK CITY, thinking is mandatory.  Unless 
you're puzzling out the answers alongside John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell), 
you're going to miss more than one revelation.  Very little is spelled 
out in this movie; the answers are all there, but you have to recognize 
them for what they are.  How often do we get features like this, that 
don't pander to the least common denominator?
     Ironically, two months into 1998, my top three films to date 
(SLIDING DOORS, OPEN YOUR EYES, and DARK CITY) all question the nature 
of identity and reality.  DARK CITY is much like OPEN YOUR EYES (which 
was shown at the 1998 Sundance Film Festival and will open theatrically 
later this year in North America) -- both are meditations on the 
importance of memory to an individual, and how everyone's personality is 
comprised of the sum total of his or her remembrances.  In the way DARK 
CITY tinkers with the boundaries of what's real and what isn't, it 
recalls THE GAME.  Some viewers may also be reminded of TOTAL RECALL, 
although Proyas' film plunges deep into issues that the Schwarzenegger 
vehicle used as icing for an action-laden cake.
     DARK CITY opens by immersing the audience in the midst of a 
fractured, nightmarish narrative.  The protagonist, who later learns 
that his name is John Murdoch, has amnesia.  He begins his "new life" as 
a full-grown adult naked in a bath tub, uncertain of how he got there.  
His only company in the grungy hotel suite is the nude body of a dead 
prostitute.  Did he kill her or not?  He doesn't know.  Suddenly, 
Murdoch receives a phone call from someone named Dr. Schreber (Kiefer 
Sutherland), who claims to have his best interests at heart.  Schreber 
warns him to get out of the hotel immediately.  Soon, without a clue 
about his identity, Murdoch is fleeing from corpse-like creatures with 
incredible mental powers.  But it turns out that Murdoch is not 
defenseless against his enemies -- his mind, like theirs, can shape 
reality, although he doesn't understand how to harness his abilities.  
Soon, his quest to unearth his past links him up with Emma (Jennifer 
Connelly), a woman who is supposedly his wife, and Police Inspector 
Bumstead (William Hurt), who believes Murdoch to be innocent of the 
prostitute's murder.  But Murdoch's small group of allies offer little 
help when it comes to dealing with his powerful, ghoulish adversaries, 
the amoral Mr. Book (Ian Richardson) and Mr. Hand (Richard O'Brien).  
     Proyas' inspiration for his Dark City appears to be New York during 
the first half of this century, but, using a style that is part science 
fiction, part noir thriller, and part gothic horror, he has embellished 
it to create a surreal place unlike no other.  Film lovers will find 
that DARK CITY is overflowing with references to classic pictures -- 
everything from the silent DRACULA adaptation, NOSFERATU, to Hitchcock's 
masterful VERTIGO.  Throw in a little TWILIGHT ZONE and STAR TREK for 
good measure.  Even if you get bored with the storyline, which is 
extremely unlikely, there are still plenty of these little details to 
absorb your attention.
     Proyas' excellent vision extends to his casting choices.  Rufus 
Sewell (currently appearing in DANGEROUS BEAUTY) makes a perfect John 
Murdoch, since he is equally good as a confused, desperate refugee and 
an avenging angel.  Kiefer Sutherland, affecting a limp and a strange 
accent, evokes images of a Nazi scientist who's more concerned with the 
experiment than with its victims.  Jennifer Connelly, who looks the part 
of a classy, black-and-white screen siren, plays her femme fatale role 
to a "T".  And William Hurt is sufficiently gruff in the kind of part 
that Humphrey Bogart would have been at home in.  
     If there's a flaw with DARK CITY (and it's a small one, to be 
sure), it's that the film takes a little too long forging a link between 
the audience and Murdoch.  For the first thirty minutes, we're left 
floating, watching the confounding narrative unfold, marveling over the 
strange occurrences, and waiting for film to really grab us.  Once that 
happens, it's difficult not to become completely engrossed.  So, is the 
lengthy setup necessary?  Almost certainly, and, as I said, any slow 
spots are only a tiny blemish on the face of a film that offers a 
gratifyingly original and stunning science fiction experience.
Now with more than 1300 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"No art passes our conscience in the way film does, and goes directly to our
feelings, deep down into the dark rooms of our souls"

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: February 27, 1998
Starring: Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, Richard
O'Brien, Ian Richardson, William Hurt
Directed by: Alex Proyas
Distributed by: New Line Cinema
MPAA Rating: R (violent images, some sexuality) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/darkcity.htm
Originality is probably the most advantageous as well as the most
detrimental component of any new movie. It's been proposed that the
American cinema audiences are being "dumbed down" by the senseless
violence, almost unrestricted sexuality, and blatant disregard for high
culture of any kind. Naturally, then, ingesting an intriguing and
original plot is going to be a tough meal. However, if one can sit up in
the theater and throw themself whole-heartedly at the mercy of the
director and the cast, one is bound to hear a good story once and
awhile. DARK CITY, by far the most original and probably the best movie
I have seen this year, is that good story. 
The intellectual science fiction isn't anything new - it's the same
thinking man's movie as CONTACT and GATTACA. But Director Alex Proyas
isn't content to let DARK CITY fall to the doldrums of meaningless
sci-fi. There's one problem with that - he's got to keep the audience's
attention. His answer: suspense and niblets of tense action. Kudos to
both he and the scriptwriter for nimbly mixing watchable action
sequences in with one drawn-out, suspensefully-orchestrated plot. The
weirdness that is the atmosphere for that plot is sure to deter some - I
can't say I don't prefer Jodie Foster in CONTACT to Rufus Sewell
here - but as film critic James Berardinelli said of this movie, it
can't suffer from too much atmosphere. 
The plot that inhabits said atmosphere is a what-if scenario. As many
bright minds have previously philosophied, imagine your world exists on
the thumbnail of a giant. Imagine that you are nothing but an experiment
in the test tube of an omnipotent alchemist. In this case, John Murdoch
(Sewell) lives in a world that's being run by the Strangers - a strange
breed whose name is aptly chosen. Headed up by respectable performances
by Richard O'Brien and Ian Richardson, their goal is to study the human
race in the confines of a city they have created. Their motive is to
learn to harness the power of the human soul as a vehicle for
themselves, for their world is dying and they need a new existence. Most
humans fall prey to their all-powerful telepathy, but Murdoch is immune
and hence must be killed - even as he struggles to figure out the
Strangers' esoteric world. 
The plot is contained nicely and well-generated given the setting.
Several movies have suffered because their settings were too dark and
enclosed to offer much watchability. In DARK CITY, on the other hand,
by the time Sewell has stepped into the sunlight in the final scene, the
audience feels an undescribable awe at the power of sunlight. One of
DARK CITY's plot facets was the absence of day, which seems as
unreal to the audience as it does to the characters. The characters are
drawn up in clear opposition of each other - good and bad are
immediately decided by the audience - and my only complaint is that
some of the characters have little substance and no motivation. Other
than that, DARK CITY is sure to be one of the year's more memorable
titles, and is recommendable to most everyone.

Author
Ryan Davis
        There isn't much good about this movie. Not much I can say about the
acting, directing, or writing that would make you consider seeing this movie.
So I'll get my one good comment out of the way, at least Joel Schuemacher
(Batman & Robin) didn't direct it or it would be titled "Technicolor City". In
fact there is nothing colorful about this movie, its dark and depressingly
gloomy right down to the bitter end.
        The plot has a tendency to be interesting, but all that passes while
your laughing at the ridiculous things thrown into what could have been a
fascinating movie. The plot is impossible to explain due to how senseless it
gets, so I will just touch on the bare minimum. John Murdoch(Rufus Sewell)
awakes in the bathtub of a cheap hotel, only to find out he has forgotten
everything. John must find out who he is before the "strangers"(a.k.a. mind
erasing aliens) find him and use him for their own evil conspiracy.  During
the film some interesting points are raised about human individuality, and
the existence of inherently evil people. Any of these points however are
completely "erased" from your  mind as you watch the actors stumble through
the dreadful script.
        As I mentioned earlier, nothing but the atmosphere is right in this
film.  The acting is bland, and since there is virtually no character
development no one seems to care. The special effects are low budget and some
even hilariously  fake, a sign of a true "B-movie".  The direction is poor
and there is little continuity, not that you would expect it in a movie
switching realities constantly. Lastly the script is weak and has no concept
of reality, and doesn't deserve to have the word "science" in
science-fiction. If I haven't got my point across, I'll say it more plainly:
This is a bad movie. Lets hope the next movie by Alex "I wish I was Tim
Burton" Proyas is at least tolerable.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Author
Dennis Schwartz
DARK CITY (director: Alex Proyas; cast: Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland,
Jennifer Connelly, Richard O'Brien, Ian Richardson, William Hurt  1998)
DARK CITY is a sci - fi/noir thriller, that portends to deliver a
message relating to the powers of the mind and the meaning of identity.
Everything attempted here has been done before, but that still doesn't
take away from the film's feeling of looking like it is an original.
Credit must go to the creative use of special effects and the
outstanding set designs used for its bedimmed city.
The film opens with the protagonist (Sewell) waking up in a tub in a
hotel room with a murdered prostitute. He is suspected of being the
serial killer who is plaguing the city. And since he is not sure if he
did it or not, he has a dazed look on his puss, like he will have
throughout the entire film. Just then, he receives a call from
Sutherland, who displays the crazed mannerisms of a Nazi - type of a
doctor, those more concerned about their inhuman experiments than the
treatment of their patients. Sewell is warned to get out of there
immediately, and sure enough there are strange creatures, who are called
Strangers, coming after him. The police are also in pursuit, they
suspect Sewell of being the serial killer they are looking for. Hurt is
the deadpan, hard - nosed type of movie cop you would see in a 40s noir
film, leading the investigation.
The Strangers we are told in the voice - over that begins the film, are
human-like aliens from another planet, who have altered the memories of
everyone in this city and have changed everyone's identity, so that no
one really knows who is who. They just assume the identity that is
secretly given to them. The Strangers have forced Sutherland, who is not
a Stranger, into working for them to inject a serum into those whose
identities are being changed. The city remains dark at all times, and at
midnight everyone becomes unconscious. Somehow Sewell slipped through
the cracks of the Strangers, and even though he has no idea of who he
is, he knows he can't be a murderer. He will become from now on the
source of our information about what the Strangers are all about. He
will be on the run for the remainder of the film, innocent though he may
be, just like a protagonist in earlier noir films, questioning authority
and trying to pull himself together, unsure of whom to trust. His visit
to the Automat brought back pleasant memories of my childhood in NYC,
but this Automat was cheerless and cold, only its bright lights served
as a sharp contrast to the dark eeriness of this city.
Sewell fingers a postcard with a serene picture of Shell Beach on it,
that he has found in his pocket. Shell Beach seems important to him, but
he doesn't know why. He sees it advertised on billboards all over town,
but when he asks directions to go there, no one can tell him how to get
there. Through Sewell's interminable questioning of everything, he
begins to unravel what is going on. He finds out that the Strangers have
telekinetic powers, enabling them to put people to sleep by focusing on
them, they can also fly and go through walls, and do mind - control
tricks. He also finds out that they came to Earth because they were
slowly dying out, they have no individuality, they only live
unconsciously. What they want to find on Earth is how humans live as
individuals, what makes them think, and what is a soul. They came to do
experiments on humans, using them as if they were guinea pigs. Sewell
was made to be a murderer and studied to see how a murderer acts before
he got away from their clutches.
Sewell has trouble decifering what is real. He questions his wife
(Jennifer), whom he does not even know, and she tells him that she had
an affair with someone else. He falls in love with her anyway, and the
message of the film becomes only too clear, it is in the heart that the
individual is born, and the heart can't be dissected and  experimented
with like a science blinded by technology and ignorant of the
imagination.
Proyas has created a visually challenging movie, that is backed - up by
some thoughtful ideas. It is the kind of film that UFO'ers and alien
watchers will tell ya', see, I told you there was life out there in
space. But to others, this is still only pedestrian stuff, it is not the
real deal. And the flat acting did not add anything positive to the
story. I enjoyed the film for its ambience and for the creative mood it
set. But what diminished its positives, was how the main purpose of the
actors seemed to be, to spout robotic messages for the characters they
were portraying. I wished that Proyas had enough confidence to allow his
visions to do the talking.
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Chad Polenz
1998, R, 100 minutes [1 hour, 40 minutes]
Starring: Rufus Sewell (John Murdoch), William Hurt (Inspector Frank 
Bumstead), Keifer Sutherland (Dr. Daniel P. Schreber), Jennifer Connelly 
(Emma Murdoch/Anna); written by Lem Dobbs, David S. Goyer, Alex Proyas; 
produced by Andrew Mason, Alex Proyas; directed by Alex Proyas.
Seen May 31, 1999 on home video (rented).
        One of the best things about the movies is that they can make you 
really start to wonder and analyze things in your own, everyday life that you 
might not have thought much of otherwise. With some films it might be just a 
secondary issue, but with `Dark City' what we get is nearly an entire film 
committed to philosophizing and theorizing about human memory and how it 
defines who we are, which is a poignant theme made through an absolutely 
beautifully-constructed film with the kind of story and setting that could 
only happen in a movie.
        There's an old role-playing computer game called `Déja Vü' wherein 
the player takes on the role of a man who can't remember who he is, where he 
is and how he got there. The goal is to gather as many clues as possible to 
figure that out and along the way overcome a conflict. The premise to this 
film is not unlike that game, only this time we don't have control over the 
protagonist. 
        We begin by meeting a seemingly ordinary man living in an extremely 
dark and dirty city (actually, it's more than just the city, it's the whole 
reality) that isn't just that neo-Gothic look (a la `Batman,' `Blade 
Runner,'), but is so fully developed it's almost a different genre 
completely. Later he will learn that his name is John Murdoch (Sewell), but 
for now he has no idea what's going on other than the fact something is not 
right. The fact there's a dead body in the corner goes to enhance the feeling 
of paranoia and a mysterious, hurried call telling him to leave immediately 
is also very chilling.
        This opening scene alone goes a long way to define the setting of the 
film and its bizarre, horrific tone. The man doesn't know who he is nor where 
he's going and it's interesting to follow him since we the viewers have no 
idea either we can sympathize and identify with him. In fact, this is the way 
all stories begin since it's impossible to know the history of a character, 
their feelings, values, morals, etc. until after we've observed them for a 
while. But in this case, the total feeling of amnesia is an excellent tool 
towards characterization, developing the mood and outlining the story.
        Eventually, some semblance of a plot begins to unfold as it appears 
that John is a serial killer wanted by the police. We met Inspector Frank 
Bumstead (Hurt), a quiet, unemotional, soft-spoken deadpan man who appears to 
have been on the trail of the killer for some time. Two other important 
characters are also introduced: Dr. Daniel P. Schreber (Sutherland), a 
neurotic psychiatrist who claims to be John's doctor; and Emma Murdoch 
(Connelly), a jazz singer dolled up to look like a caraciture right out of 
the old Dick Tracy serials or any given leading lady of the old film-noir 
movies. It was Schreber who contacted John for reasons that are continually 
revealed throughout the course of the film. He also contacts Emma, which 
further helps the film reveal what is seemingly a complex, mysterious back 
story.
        But absolutely nothing is as it appears to be in `Dark City,' which 
is what makes it so fascinating throughout its continual scenes of confusion 
and vertigo. Everything the filmmakers want us to see has some significance - 
considering how intricate the detail is to every single shot, its lighting, 
art direction and overall production design, they don't seem to be able to 
afford any gratuities. However, that might also be what's keeping it from 
reaching its maximum potential. 
        By continuing to follow John as he wanders around this strange place, 
so much unlike the real world we know, we come to realize that it's all a 
hoax. Everyone in the city is the subject of an experiment being conducted by 
a race of aliens to understand what makes humans tick in their efforts to 
somehow save themselves from extinction. But, as the film's tagline says, 
`Last night, one of us went off.'
        For reasons that are never clearly explained, it appears that John 
possesses telekinetic powers to can do pretty much whatever his mind can 
conceive (a process known as `tuning'). The aliens, which look like very old 
bald human men with pasty skin, also possess the power en masse and use it to 
change the city every night at midnight. At the same time all the humans fall 
asleep and after the changes are made, they awake and either continue where 
they left off or begin a new life they have no idea they did not have until 
then.
        This premise certainly is interesting and director and 
co-screenwriter Alex Proyas is able to keep the film consistently mysterious 
in this regard. He does provide some explanations such as that Dr. Schreber 
is an assistant to `The Strangers' because he somehow could synthesize memory 
into chemical form. The aliens mix and match the memories of the city's 
population to see who will change and who will not. In the process this 
creates for a good deal of deep, thought-provoking philosophies that could be 
applied to the real world.
        However, where the film errs is by not playing up the idea of memory 
versus the human heart as to what makes a person who he or she is. The main 
characters are all closely intertwined within the seemingly complex murder 
mystery which never actually happened, yet when they start to go through some 
of the expected emotions it comes off as distant, static and cold (mediocre 
performances by Hurt and Connelly don't help either). For example, John 
realizes Emma is not and probably never was his wife so he does not feel an 
emotional bond to her, yet in some scenes crucial to the film's plot, we are 
expected to believe they do have a genuine love for each other, which is also 
part of the film's climax and ending.
        And that's what Proyas seems to be inferring with the film, but never 
quite manages to convey in its fullest sense. Ironically, this is what made 
his first film `The Crow' work so well, which had a similar theme of 
struggling to find hope and the human spirit within a nearly identical, dark 
twisted world. With `Dark City' the messenger seems to be mistaken for the 
message.
        Still, the film is by no means bad and is consistently entertaining 
and enjoyable. There's a lot to like here, most notably the sheer visual look 
and style of it all which accounts for at least half the reasons the film is 
able to tell the story it does. The story as a whole is one of the most 
original to come out of Hollywood in years. `Dark City' is what the movies 
are all about - the escape from the real world.
---------------------------------
Please visit Chad'z 
Movie Page
 - over 220 new and old movies reviewed in-depth, not just blind ratings 
and blather capsules.
Member of The O.F.C.S. (Online Film 
Critics Society)

Author
George Wilcox
"Dark City" gave me a splitting headache, but one day later the movie
makes less sense to me than it did when I watched it.
Director Alex Proyas' followup to the underrated "The Crow," is a
loud, bulky, visual-effects laden mess of a movie. It's a cross
between Stephen Soderbergh's "Kafka" and "Hellraiser: Bloodline" by
legendary B-movie director Alan Smithee. At least, I think it
was. "Dark City" made as much sense as "Spawn," and how could I ever
forget the worst movie of 1997 since it is five months, 20 days and 14
hours since I've seen it?
Proyas should have brought Smithee in to finish "Dark City," but it
appears he had too much invested in the convoluted story since it was
his idea to begin with. He also co-wrote the screenplay and
co-produced the movie.
How do I tell you about a movie that I didn't understand? It's films
like "Dark City" that give science fiction movies a bad name. A
mult-million dollar budget spent on a 10-cent script. "Dark City" is
set in an unknown world, on an unknown planet in an unknown part of
the galaxy.  The city looks as dreary as Metropolis, or even
futuristic L.A. from "Blade Runner," but there are no spaceships
here. Only 1940s era Studebakers and elevated trains.
Even more is unknown about its citizens. How did they get there? Who
are they? There is never any daylight and no one is quite sure of what
the world is like outside the city. The script gives few details about
any backstory, and that is Proyas' main downfall. Go ahead and spend
tons of dough on George Liddle's production designs, but send this
story back to re-write.
The film begins with an opening pan of the city stolen from the
aforementioned "Metropolis."
Rufus Sewell ("Dangerous Beauty") stars, in his second film to open on
the same day, as amnesia victim John Murdoch, who awakens from his
bathtub to discover a dead woman in his hotel room. Murdoch becomes a
suspect in a series of killings involving hookers. With a memory lapse
lasting three weeks, Murdoch searches for his lounge singing wife,
Emma (Jennifer Connelly). He also has a strange mind power borrowed
from "Dune," but that's never explained as well. Sewell's performance
is clearly mailed-in as he seems to sleepwalk through much of the
movie.
>From there, you're on your own as to understanding the rest of the
plot. Check your brain at the door. "Dark City" joins a long list of
films that make absolutely no sense, beginning with such recent
story-impaired movies like "Mission:Impossible," "The Jackal," "Johnny
Mnemonic" or "Destiny Turns on the Radio."
In "Dark City," the Strangers, a group of Pinhead wannabes, control
the city from their underground lair. Each day (each half day?) they
make time stop at the stroke of 12 so that they could change the
buildings around in the city while everyone else is temporarily
asleep. Ahem.  Fine British actor Ian Richardson plays the boss, but
he's not so fine here, barely recognizable in his Cenobite look-alike
garb. His right-hand man, Mr. Hand (Richard O'Brien), is one of the
ghouls that chases after Murdoch for no apparent reason.
The disfigured Dr. Daniel Schreber (Keifer Sutherland) acts as an
agent between the city dwellers and the underground dwellers.
Oscar winner William Hurt, who disappeared from major studio films
through much of the 90s, begins the year with the first of four
movies. He starts off as the meaningless Inspector Bumstead. Bumstead
is brought in to take over the serial hooker killings case, but that
subplot is completely forgotten by the end. I don't get it. Hurt is
trying to mount a comeback starting with "Dark City" and "Lost in
Space?"

Author
Christian MacInnis
Upon arriving at the theater during the opening credits, I took my seat
and prepared myself for what appeared to be "Hellraiser meets The Crow". 
But as soon as Kiefer Sutherland began speaking the narrative monologue,
describing "The Strangers" and their reasons for contacting human beings, I
was hooked.
There was something especially compelling about the nature of his voice. 
I knew from the start that I was going to witness the actions of his
character rather than the actor attempting the character.  Sutherland
played the role as a true veteran.  Upon the completion of his monologue,
the camera arrives on Sutherland in such a fashion that you can only wonder
how long Alex Proyas spent on cinematography.  I would imagine, for a film
of this caliber, that maximum hours of work were spent where they were
needed the most.  The film flowed beautifully.  
As I was being taken through the intricate regions of the "Dark City", a
clever plot began to unravel, to the point where the last time I had seen
such clever plot twists were in "The Usual Suspects".  Not to mention a
series of special effects that would make James Cameron literally turn
green with envy.  
But if you're not exactly the biggest sci-fi fan, caveat emptor.  Get
ready for the atmostpheric darkness of "12 Monkeys" or "The Crow" without
the boredom or depression.  The concept of the plot is as mindstretching as
"12 Monkeys" was, however, so be prepared and be sophisticated.  And
imagine a picture that finally does justice to the
comic-book-gone-feature-film fad that Hollywood has recently become abusive
of.  DARK CITY simply puts "Spawn" to shame.  In fact, during the climax of
the film I couldn't help but feel the strong presence of an "Akira"-esque
explosion throughout the general feeling of the movie.  So my initial
predictions were wrong.  This film is anything but the meloncholy of
"Hellraiser" parts one through five.
I'm never one to base a film entirly on special effects, so know that when
I give DARK CITY 
it's actually because the film contained all of the neccessary ingredients
to keep me entertained and awake from storyline to plot twists to
camerawork to even (tsk, tsk) special effects.  Not since Contact have I
recieved such deep insight into the way the human mind operates and never
this year have I been so blown away.  The best film I've seen all year, and
easily one of the best I've ever seen

Author
Bill Chambers
DARK CITY ** (out of four)
-by Bill Chambers - wchamber@netcom.ca
(For more purple prose check out
FILM FREAK CENTRAL
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Set/7504
I now include a section where YOU the surfer can recommend movies to
ME and other netheads. Have a freakin' good time.)
starring Rufus Sewell, William Hurt, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly
written by Lem Dobbs, David S. Goyer and Alex Proyas
directed by Alex Proyas
This review is more like an open letter to Alex Proyas, and thus
contains plot spoilers, which I urge you to indulge in if you haven't
yet seen this film, so you may donate your admission to a more
charitable cause.
It has to be said right away. Dark City is a deeply ironic film for
the following reason: this is a movie about the search for the human
soul, and yet it is entertainment entirely devoid of feeling. The
Crow's Proyas is so fussy about the look of his film that not even
three writers could save it from becoming an expensive- looking CD-ROM
adventure, replete with B-grade actors (Hurt excepted) and an
unsatisfactory conclusion.
Sewell stars as John, a man who wakes up one evening in a hotel
bathtub with a dead prostitute just outside the door. He can't
remember anything, and the Peter Lorre- impersonating doctor
(Sutherland) who phones him tells him only to flee the building, for
"The Strangers" are after him. In long, black trenchcoats and
wide-brimmed hats, The Strangers, a dying alien race in search of the
secrets of the human soul (they believe it may be the key to a
prolonged existence), pursue John through the streets of the dark
metropolis. It seems he poses a threat, for he can "tune"; like The
Strangers, John can stare at an object and have it morph into
something else, which poses a serious threat to them, though I must
admit even after 11 days of considering the story, I'm not sure why
this is.  The gorgeous Connelly is stuck in a thankless role as a
sultry jazz club singer for that dash of retro, and Hurt is the
detective on the non-case.
Proyas refuses to tackle certain issues. For instance, Connelly sings
melancholy tunes nightly, and Hurt plays his accordian by the light of
the street every evening after work. Instead of exploring the unifying
power of music as perhaps a key to the human soul, once the plot kicks
in Connelly and Hurt ditch their pastimes and we realize it was all
just filler, pretty moments in a movie made up entirely of either neat
or pretty moments that don't gel as a cohesive whole. And, like the
recent The Fifth Element, the screenwriters take great pains here to
establish their own logic that they then adhere to only when stuck in
a corner. Why is it John "tunes" a door onto a cement wall to escape
his enemies early on, but later in the film, when he discovers one of
the plot's big revelations may lie behind a gigantic brick wall, he
picks up a sledgehammer and starts smashing it apart? (Also, would he
really have the energy to do so, since he's been up for days?) The
Strangers have this identical "tuning" power, and yet some of them
seem to forget about it at inappropriate times, and die as a result.
Perhaps the silliest plot point has Sutherland fleeing to a giant pool
whenever he wants to hide from The Strangers, for they are afraid of
"moisture". Is this development dwelled upon at all after it is
introduced? No. Not even when it could have made for a hell of a
sequence: at one point, Sutherland, Hurt and Sewell find themselves in
a canoe, boating upstream to a mysterious beach. The Strangers could
have surrounded the boat, but they wouldn't have been able to attack
John and company for their collective fear of the river. Likewise,
John and company would not have been able to attack them, because they
would have had to exit the boat to do so. This could have been a very
tense moment, one I anticipated since they mapped it out for
themselves, and yet, what happens? John and company exit the boat and
proceed to destroy said wall. There are very few payoffs in this
screenplay.
For all its flaws, Dark City is a triumph of production design, and
the CGI effects are impressive. Proyas also resists the urge to gum up
the sound track with alternative tunes, dashing any studio hopes of a
hit tie-in album. And I must cop to being intrigued for the first half
of the film. Hurt is just fine in his role, and Sutherland has his
moments, but, for the most part, the acting is weak across the board.
Sewell is uncharismatic and we never get any real sense of jeopardy
from his noteless performance. Throughout Dark City, I couldn't help
but imagine one poor, lost Stranger, sitting in a darkened cinema,
tuning Proyas's film into something stronger.

Author
Jamie Peck
New Line / 1:43 / 1998 / R (violence, language, nudity, muted sex)
Cast: Rufus Sewell; Kiefer Sutherland; Jennifer Connelly; William Hurt; 
Richard O'Brien; Ian Richardson; Colin Friels; Mitchell Butel 
Director: Alex Proyas 
Screenplay: Lem Dobbs; David S. Goyer; Alex Proyas 
What's worse: a movie that glows with unfulfilled promise, or one that 
shows no promise at all? Alex Proyas' "Dark City" falls into the former 
category without a doubt, and it's a shortcoming that should leave its 
viewers with quite a bad aftertaste. But the operative word here is 
"should," especially seeing as how "Dark City" is one of those cinematic 
experiences that sticks with and grows on you. It's still a wildly uneven 
film, full of ham, cheese and more than a few bouts of sporadic silliness, 
but it's got immense style to spare and a screenplay that's quite 
intriguing. I hesitate to call "Dark City" solid, or even really *good,* 
but if ever a two-and-a-half star film bordered so very close to mild 
success, it's this one. 
"Dark City" takes place in, well, a dark city -- a swirling vortex of 
menacing ambiance, kind of like a sinister New York with all of the lights 
turned out. The residents of this place appear to be unaware that it always 
seems to be nighttime, and they move about their surroundings in an oddly 
detached way. Also adding to the province's sky-high weird quotient is an 
underworld group of beings known only as the Strangers. The Strangers are 
death-pale, capable of flying and possess a strange psychic power called 
Tuning -- they can alter physical environment just by focusing on any given 
object or location. 
One random night, a man (Rufus Sewell) wakes up naked in a seedy motel 
bathtub and finds a prostitute stabbed to death in the adjoining bedroom. 
He has no idea who he is, how he got there or what exactly is going on, so 
he flees the scene promptly. The man -- who later learns his name is John 
Murdoch and that he's married to an estranged nightclub singer (Jennifer 
Connelly) -- is put at the top of a wanted list by a determined detective 
(William Hurt). While on the run and trying to uncover answers about his 
seemingly altered state, he discovers that he's a master of Tuning as well, 
and is also targeted by the Strangers and their human lackey (Kiefer 
Sutherland) who likely see Murdoch as a kink in their shady plans. 
"Dark City" doesn't quite get off to a stable start, as it takes some time 
to adjust to the prattling manner in which Proyas introduces his cast of 
warped characters. The funky narrative eventually draws you in; while 
you're waiting, pay attention to the movie's dazzling visual flair, which 
emanates both film noir and science-fiction sensibilities. "Dark City" 
looks fantastic thanks to behind-the-scenes work from production designers 
George Liddle and Patrick Tatopoulos and cinematographer Dariusz Wolski; 
these Oscar-worthy attributes hold up even when the movie degenerates into 
all-out craziness towards its end, as Murdoch battles a plethora of enemies 
that look like they just walked off of the "Hellraiser" set. 
The assembled cast is curious, to say the very least. Sewell (most widely 
seen in "Cold Comfort Farm") fares best in the lead, creating a protagonist 
who's engaging and likeable. You root for him, even though at times you're 
not quite sure what you're rooting for him to do. Luscious bombshell 
Connelly ("Inventing the Abbotts") isn't given much to do, but looks so 
very fine in her pseudo-period duds. While Sutherland overacts with halting 
speech enunciation, Hurt counteracts by deadpanning a little too dull -- 
these guys are interesting, but not very well played out. And as one of the 
more prominent Strangers, Richard O'Brien seems to have found another role 
destined for instant cult success; he played Riff-Raff in 1973's "The Rocky 
Horror Picture Show." 
The middle segments of "Dark City" work fantastically, overcoming some 
opening and closing missteps. For the most part, the film marks a more 
mature, assured effort from Proyas, whose 1994 hit "The Crow" was a 
one-note revenge thriller that captured Brandon Lee's soulful swan song. 
There are some great ideas at work here (for instance, a series of final 
denouements that are actually quite engrossing in their explanation), but 
they're executed in a movie that sometimes just doesn't click. Is "Dark 
City" a great film? No. But does it attempt to be something more than comic 
book-eye candy? Yes, and it almost works. 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Author
Matthew Brissette
For about five minutes , Dark City is the most boring experience of
your life: A narrator explains how beings from a distant galaxy are
experimenting on us poor humans to gain better understanding of the
soul. These beings , called strangers , use a technique called "tuning"
to shape reality into whatever fits their purposes. Following this corny
intro , we are introduced to our heroes and villains at such a rapid
fire pace that we fail to become immersed in this film. So yeah , for
five minutes Dark City left me wondering if i should abandon my jumbo
tub o' crispy , threatening to establish a permanent home in my throat
and foul tasting pieces of dried up boogers ( commonly known as popcorn
) to the mercy of the kid kicking the back of my seat.
        Let me tell you , Dark City is the real deal. An expertly woven story ,
more twists and turns than Ronald Reagan 's brow , acting ranging superb
to good , a creepy music score and the coolest special effects in recent
memory. Now i know what you are thinking , that any second from now i
will start singing a song praising the glory of this movie. You might
even suspect i think that Dark City is the second coming of movies.
Eeeenh! Wrong , i am not trying to get more people into theaters to see
this flick , as a matter of fact i happen to think that some people
should stay away from it and stick to more healthy flicks like Titanic
and Good Will Hunting.
        Movies like this cater to a very small audience. Let me put it this way
, if you hated Event Horizon because of it's religious overtones , hated
the Devil 's Advocate because you thought that "it was all a dream" like
some idiots i know and had trouble swallowing Contact because the
possibility of alien life is way over your head...stay away from this
movie. All you will do is walk away from it and tell all your friends
that "it 's so darned stupid". That 's how closed minded most people
are. 
        If you liked to movies mentioned above then you will enjoy Dark City.
Not that the Devil and religion in general are important in this story
but if you can buy that the Devil is here on earth , you have the
necessary requirements to appreciate DC. 
        I will not give away anything more of the plot , just like the trailers
for the movie. If you know too much it will ruin the half dozen
surprises scattered throughout the movie. Suffice it to say , your jaw
will drop to the sticky theater floor more than once. ( Just watch out
for the green stuff on the floors , i hear it 's radioactif. ) In fact ,
i felt that the less than talkative trailers added to the fun i had. Who
needs to see Wesley Snipes jump from the building in the trailer for U.S
Marshalls? Or Bruce Willis save the kid from Mercury Rising before the
train crushes him? 
        But i am moving away from my review. Rufus Sewell stars , for some
reason he reminded me of Luke Skywalker. Especially during his final
confrontation with the head stranger ( strangest stranger? ) who looks a
bit like an unmasked Darth Vader. ( You know , the old dried up prune
look. )
        Anyway , i recommend Dark City over most movies now in theaters ,
except for most of the oscar nominated ones. All in all , one heck of a
good time. 
        Rating: 3 and a half stars out of 4 for creepy bad guys , the best
morphing effects ever , several "now i get it" moments and the single
best , explosive , pulse pounding , Luke versus Vader round three and
there will not be a round four , awesome ending ever.
>From imdb.com  Sat Feb 28 12:36:19 1998
Envelope-to: robh@uk1.imdb.com
Delivery-date: Sat, 28 Feb 1998 06:13:17 +0000
Received: from uk1.imdb.com
        by localhost (fetchmail-4.3.1 POP3 run by robh)
        for  (single-drop); Sat Feb 28 12:36:18 1998
Received: from us1.imdb.com [169.207.1.254] 
        by uk1.imdb.com with smtp (Exim 1.62 #1)
        id 0y8fTu-000356-00; Sat, 28 Feb 1998 06:10:42 +0000
Received: from exim by us1.imdb.com with local (Exim 1.61 #1)
        id 0y8fOP-0001zj-00; Sat, 28 Feb 1998 00:05:01 -0600
To: robh@imdb.com
Subject: Exim rejections US1
Message-Id: 
From: exim 
Date: Sat, 28 Feb 1998 00:05:01 -0600
Status: RO
X-Status: 
1998-02-27 02:21:45 sender rejected:   H=terminator2.xtra.co.nz [202.27.184.2]

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen

Despite deep, deep misgivings about "Dark City", from how bad the TV
commericals look after the seriously cool theater trailers, and from
word of mouth, I went to see the movie last night and was surprised.
It didn't totally suck; it wasn't totally cheesy.
This is a science fiction/fantasy/horror film that aspires to art.  The
visions this film presents gets up there -- it's very pretty, with the
fish being released into the water merely being the first of many
elegant images -- but the writing fails here and there, and then breaks
down completely near the end.  The writers, whether through a failure
of talent or through a cave-in to a producer's low opinion of the
audience, try to explain everything in agonizing, repetitive detail,
far worse than "Blade Runner" with the voice-over.  Mysteries are
solved and removed before they have a chance to be savored and
revealed.
It's also not a completely original piece of work.  The film concerns a
man who wakes up in a hotel room, with his memories gone.  It's an old
plot, though, the twist here is to make his quest to regain memory into
a meditation on the idea of memory and identity.  Philip K. Dick has
done this any number of times, usually better.  While a less pretty and
less serious film than "Dark City", the PKD inspired "Total Recall"
perhaps makes for a better meditation on memory and identity if you
ignore the Schwarzenneger pyrotechnics.  We won't get into PKD's
stories or the intensely literary and just-as-elegantly-shot "Blade
Runner".
There are a few moments when the film wanders into stupidity, but
generally not fatally.  At one point, a character is informed of his
god-like powers of shaping reality.  He uses the powers to make a beach
-- a lame one -- instead of, say, building temples and calling on the
people to cast golden calves in his honor.  (That's what I'd do.  I
suppose I shouldn't achieve god-like powers.)  Oh, the god-like powers
are expressed by a woo-woo-woo-woo rings coming from out of foreheads.
Awe-inspiring, this isn't.  Actually, thinking about it, I'm not sure
how god-like the powers are, since the evil-people have them, and they
work in labor-intensive ways, either in Dickensian infernal mills or as
roadies in a mysterious rigging company.  They also have to get very
close to mere mortals in order to put them to sleep (in a
less-lame-than-expected gesture of the hand and a slinkily spoken
"sleep" -- it looked really good in the trailer, since you're hearing
only industrial-like music, but looks really bad in the commercials
since you can hear them talking)
The bad guys are "derivative" or "refers to", depending on if you're in
a good mood or not.  The Strangers seem to be inspired by the old
silent film "Nosferatu".  Except for pointy teeth, they're dead ringers
for the first on-screen vampire, complete with bald head and
out-of-proportion limbs.  There is something deliciously creepy about
these figures carrying knives and wearing cheerily malevolent smiles.
Yes, some of the good photography in "Dark City" may be inspired by
Expressionist films, though any movie scenes featuring tall, lean
figures in the shadows may be references to that style.
The art design for the film -- the costumes, the cars, the props (which
looked like models, actually) -- borrows from the 1930s, arguably the age
of totalitarianism, though that wasn't made explicit (which, given how
much they like to explain everything, was missed by the writers).  The
issues of identity and control certainly has totalitarian implications,
though my main thought was, how did people in the 1930s avoid hat hair?
One question for the audience: when did clocks acquire mystical
significance?  The film's production company is in fact called "Mystery
Clock" -- a good name -- but mechanical clocks didn't exist until a
few hundred years ago.  The idea of the mystery clock hasn't been with
us forever.  Cinderella focuses on the stroke of midnight, but when did
this motif come about?  The story is older than clocks.
Oh, one thing they might have done, which would've been cute, would've
been to put a couple pair of elephants standing on a big turtle in a
particular scene.  You'll know which it is.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Alex Proyas
Writers: Alex Proyas, Lem Dobbs, and  David S. Goyer (based on a story by
Alex Proyas)
Starring: Rufus Sewell, Keifer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, William Hurt,
Richard O'Brien, Ian Richardson, Melissa George
"Dark City" is a film that Kafka probably would have enjoyed.  It's a film
that presents a nightmare world, where everything is controlled by a group
of supernatural creatures who have strange, mystic abilities beyond the
control of humans.  It's a film where one man stands alone, apart from
everything else, and with no prior memory of how he got there, but
possessing the will to find out what has happened and why.  And it's a film
where all of the strangeness and generally creepiness is backed up with a
higher thinking concerning humanity and their role in determining their
individuality.  Yeah, Kafka would really have dug this.
"Dark City" concerns, well, a city in perpetual darkness.  As the film
opens, we meet a man (Rufus Sewell) who awakens in a bath tub, naked, and
not having any memory of how he got there.  After stumbling around a bit
for clues, he finds a suitcase with clothes and a postcard in it, a broken
syringe on the floor, and a murdered woman next to a bed.  He soon
discovers his name is John Murdoch, and we follow him as he searches out
his identity, how and why he came to wake up in the bath tub, and whether
or not he killed that woman.
The film sometimes switches to different perspectives, and we meet other
characters involved in John's life.  We meet his estranged night club
singer wife, Emma (the lucious and lustful Jennifer Connelly), who has been
looking for him since he has apparently disappeared from her life for
awhile; Dr. Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland), a crippled doctor who somehow
knows John was in the room when he woke up; and a police investigator
(William Hurt) who is on the search for John, as he believes he has
murdered several prostitutes in the past couple weeks.
I will not reveal many of John's discoveries throughout the film, as it's
the source of many of the film's fun and inventiveness, but I will say that
he stumbles upon an alien race living beneath the surface, called The
Strangers.  They are a huge group of men, all donning long black robes, all
having shaved white heads, and possessing the ability to stop time and the
ability to "tune," which is a psychic power that allows them to change
things in the city, mostly when everyone's asleep.  Since John also has the
ability to "tune," he becomes the object of their obsession, and is soon
being stalked by all of them in order to be killed.
"Dark City" was directed by Alex Proyas, who you may remember as the
director of the cult classic pic "The Crow" (not the second one; only the
first one), which was a classic revenge story told magnificently, with lots
of emotion and a style that gave it a very comic book feel (it was also the
film where Brandon Lee, son of Bruce, was killed on the set, which sent
Proyas into a pit of depression for years until he decided to make this
film as his sophomore effort).  However, "Dark City" is nothing like "The
Crow."  It's not a comic book film, and it doesn't have many big action set
pieces.  Instead, it is a film portraying a human sadness, and creating a
strange, kafkaesque mood throuhgout.  Proyas has expanded his abilities on
"Dark City," and has created a film that is much more ambiguous and full of
more thought.
It's not an action pic, but is instead a film of ideas and theories...just
the kind of weird films I like.  Proyas' view on humanity is that we rely
too much on a form of deity to control our minds and that we should break
out from that and become individuals, gods of our own realms.  The
Strangers are the gods in this film, and Proyas has an interesting and
intelligent take on them.  They are not merely out to screw up creation,
but to observe them with the intent of trying to understand their souls,
the things that make them tick.  In Christianity, we (meaning those of us
who were raised as Christians, that is...even if we later rebelled against
it) are brought up to believe that God created us, I guess, out of boredom
or the need to create.  The Strangers in this film have created humans to
try and understand the thing that they do not have: individuality.
It is the goal of John, then, to try and overcome their power, since he was
born with a genetic defect that gave him the ability to "tune" like they do
(this is never really explained very well...but really, what reason would
be sufficient?), and can therefore do battle with them once he understands
exactly what he's doing.  The film moves along as he and we learn
information along the way, and by the finale, when we have discovered
everything there is to learn, we have the grande finale, a sequence which
may be a tad cheap and nihilistic, but is at least satisfying, and brings
about an intelligent conclusion about our state in the grand scheme of
things.
Maybe I'm overanalyzing this film though.  Maybe it's just supposed to be a
cool bit of neo-Kafka, featuring a proposterous idea about a bunch of
people called The Strangers, and a completely amazing production design.  I
will say that as eye candy, this bleak film is jaw dropping.  The sets are
astoundingly cool-looking, the cinematography is just amazing, with lots of
control over shadows and light (much like "The Crow"), and special effects
which may seem a tad cheesy at times, but look damn cool.  Compared to "The
Crow," this film, which combines all kinds of old architecture, is better
looking.  But we already knew that from the commercials anyway (the
previews were cool as hell, weren't they?).
However, as a whole, this film does what it set out to do: creating a
bizarre and intriguing look at man's role in his (or her) fate, with a
message to become master of his (or her) domain (if you'll pardon the
disgusting imagery).  Sure, it may not be the most brilliant film, and may
possess a couple flaws which cripple it from becoming an instant classic
(it's not going to ever be a "Metropolis"), but at least it amazes for what
it is.
The acting in this film is surprisingly good.  Rufus Sewell, a
Shakespearean and period piece actor (known for the British films
"Carrington," "Cold Comfort Farm," Branagh's "Hamlet" - he was Fortinbras -
and the recently released "Dangerous Beauty"), brings his great acting
abilities to his role, which could have been a throwaway performance by a
lesser actor, but instead is a very sympathetic performance.  Because of
Sewell, it's easy to like John Murdoch, and not just because he's the lead.
In supporting roles, Kiefer Sutherland is pretty awesome as the enslaved
Dr. Schreber, forced into helping The Strangers, but hiding a will to rebel
against them.  He speaks as if he's always out-of-breath, pausing between
words in sentences to take a breath (it's surprisingly enough not
annoying).  Jennifer Connelly once again gets a pretty thin role, showing
off more of her beauty than her acting abilities.  She rarely gets a role
that allows her to combine both (see her in "Mulholland Falls" for an
exception to this), but at least she's cool in this (not to mention...wow).
 William Hurt brings some drollness to his role, which is underwritten a
bit, and reminds us why we liked him back in the 80s, even if not enough
(this is probably a better performance than his in the upcoming "Lost in
Space," though).  And as one of the head Strangers, ex-Rocky Horror Picture
Show man, Richard O'Brien (remember Riff Raff?) gives another wacky
performance, albeit not as memorable as Riff Raff (but how could it be?).
I have to say that despite a crappy theatre with the sound blaring out too
much (it was a sneak preview at my college's crap theatre - I wasn't
expecting quality), I very much enjoyed "Dark City," actually more than I
did "The Crow."  Although it doesn't unfold as neatly as it should (I would
have liked it to have actually opened up on John in the tub, instead of
giving us some background information - wouldn't that have been cool?),
it's still a wild ride that is never boring or dull, and never insults the
intelligence.  And that, my friend(s), makes all the difference.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, Richard
O'Brien, Ian Richardson, William Hurt Director: Alex Proyas Producers:
Andrew Mason and Alex Proyas
Screenplay: Alex Proyas and Lem Dobbs and David S. Goyer
Cinematography:  Dariusz Wolski
There's something surreal about the world of DARK CITY. It has a deja vu
feel of a distant memory or a vivid dream. It is always night and at the
stroke of twelve, everything stops. Lives are rearranged, memories
stolen, as if everything here runs under the influence of some alien
clockwork. The imagery is strangely beautiful, mysteriously haunting,
and intricately woven into the strangeness of the flow. You continually
ask yourself, where is this place? Who are these players? There is no
simple answer.
Made in Australia, this is a remarkable achievement in STYLE and should
be commended for this, if for anything. Alex Proyas - known for his
gothic imagery in THE CROW, has infused this movie with visual images
that speak louder than the script. Unfortunately, not many people may
take to this kind of story telling. Tastes vary, but this movie may be
too imaginative, creative, progressive for some, and unfortunately
labelled weird or alternative. This movie is undoubtedly one of the
better Australian-made movies this year, (compared to crap, like JOEY
and CRACKERS) and is a milestone in visual cinema in itself.
With a budget of only 27 million, the money is well spent and stretched
to the limit. Good value has been spent on employing a cast worth their
weight in fees. William Hurt gives the movie credibility, Kiefer
Sutherland is in one of his better roles, Jennifer Connely has put on
weight since THE ROCKETEER and Rufus Sewell has eyes as haunting as the
city itself. This movie looks like it had a budget of 50-70 million and
it shows that good movies can still be made with only a limited budget.

Author
Brandon Stahl
Written and Directed by Alex Proyas
Starring Rufus Sewell, William Hurt, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly
Dark City is such a rare treat: itšs a stunning, hyperkinetic vision of a
place where our reality is fused with noir, science fiction and the darkest
nights in Manhattan and London. To boot, it is accompanied by an intense,
well written and thoughtful story. Movies of this caliber and idea arenšt
made too often, and itšs unfortunate that I waited this long to see it. Alex
Proyas, whošs previous film The Crow looked good but couldnšt cover up the
terrible acting or story, here shows a near masterpiece; a combination of
Metropolis, Edward Hopper and Phillip Marlowe, fused seemlessly.  At times
it moves beyond film into artwork.
It is the story of łstrangers˛, aliens from another planet (and we know
theyšre aliens because they shave their heads and wear overcoats  one of
the detractions of the film) who experiment on humans to discover what makes
them live, what makes up our łsoul˛. These aliens are superior to humans 
because they have mastered the łultimate technology˛ of shaping matter with
their mind, called łtuning. They are aided by a human scientist, played by
Kiefer Sutherland, who has łbetrayed his kind˛ and at the start of the film
watches as the entire city stops at exactly midnight. During this time, John
Murdoch, played swiftly by Rufus Sewell, wakes in a bathtub in a room with a
swinging overhead light (a terrific visual effect - not only is Murdoch
confused, but so is the audience). Without a memory and a strange guilt that
he may be a killer, he receives a phone call to flee, as the strangers are
after him.
I donšt want to proceed to much further with the explanation of the story;
One of the pleasures of the film is watching it develop, in a way regaining
Murdochšs łidentity˛ along with him. Itšs a pleasure to watch the characters
develop through the cinematography. Murdochšs wife, Anna, is introduced
through a stunning beam of light: she is a lounge singer who sings into a
bright spotlight. Shadows, outlines of men in hats watch, as she gently
curves through the shine. We see the outline of her body from behind, an
hourglass, as she sings a slow, rhythmic song. A great entrance.
However, a film such as this is only successful if the morals and themes
behind it are strong enough to leave the viewer satisfied. The city is nice
to look at, but if itšs a poor story then itšs not worth watching. Blade
Runner was popular not only because itšs visuals, but itšs story and themes
were thought out and provoked strong response from the audience. It is
discussed it and argued, therefore a success. Other science fiction films of
recent times, such as the Fifth Element, are nice to look at, but are
dropped and forgotten because the cookie cutter moral behind them is so
flimsy. Wešre left with łlove conquers all˛ after finishing the Fifth
Element. Dark City is not so easily explained away. As the strangers
discovered, locating the human soul and discovering what makes us survive is
not such an easy task. Where is reality?
Dark City is certainly the best science fiction film of the 90šs, and ranks
along with the best made in the 80s, such as Blade Runner and the two Aliens
films. Perhaps itšs the best of the both decades; it had the darkness of the
Aliens films, as well as the visuals and compelling story of Blade Runner,
but moved beyond, I think, because the themes behind it were much stronger.
Anyone who wants to make an argument for better science fiction films please
feel free to write, Išd love to hear it. 

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
The trailer for Dark City looked so cool.  Well, I guess the actual
movie looked cool, too.  It just wasn't cool.  In fact, it kinda blew.
This is what I think it was about
John Murdoch (Sewell, Dangerous Beauty) wakes up in a hotel tub.  He has
no recollection of who he is, how he got there or if he sliced up the
whore in his room.  Afraid that he may be a serial killer, the confused
but aptly named John flees the scene.
The ensuing ninety minutes involve a wacky doctor (Sutherland), a
brilliant cop (Hurt) and a pack of evil floating bald guys in hats and
long black trench coats.  The bad men, who have nifty names like Mr.
Hand and Mr. Book, are from another world and have come to earth to
continuously experiment on us humans so that they can live longer.  John
is an experiment gone bad because he can do crazy shit with his mind.
Or something.  Now, on to the important stuff.
Dark City looks awesome.  Its set design is kind of a cross between The
Hudsucker Proxy, Metropolis, City of Lost Children and Batman.  It's
perpetually nighttime (hence the title) and always sinister looking,
even when the building aren't trying to kill you.  From the looks of it,
Dark City is supposed to be set in the 40's, but who the hell could
concentrate with the throbbing pulse of Trevor Jones music.  The
inhabitants of the Dark City don't even realize that it's never daytime,
so don't ask them.
Writer/Director Alex Proyas (The Crow) needs to stop it with the writing
and concentrate on making the pretty.  He needs to find a good script
and just direct it.  Dark City makes it obvious that Proyas suffers from
Attention Deficit Disorder.  The quick, choppy editing is at first
appearance annoying and later laughable.  The guy sitting next to me
said it was like taking a regular conversation and editing out all of
the spaces between the words.  Mercifully, this made Dark City short,
which is its second greatest attribute.
While the production package is certainly the high point, the acting is
pretty decent as well.  Sewell is relatively unknown to the mindless
U.S. filmgoers and the girls will probably like his bare bum, which is
shown in the first few minutes.  Hurt and Sutherland pull of believable
performances in unbelievable roles, but I will never know why people
continue to cast Jennifer Connelly.  She sucks the life out of every
scene that she is in.  She has two great assets, but you don't even get
to see them, so why bother?  Potential viewers should ask themselves
that question before doling out their cash for this picture.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     "First came darkness, then came the strangers," we are told in the
opening to the macabre, science fiction thriller, DARK CITY, by the
director of THE CROW.  It seems "the strangers" have come from another
world and, like Nazi doctors, have a series of diabolical experiments
they are conducting on the local inhabitants' memories.
     In a cast with significant depth, Kiefer Sutherland plays Dr.
Schreber, who has sold his soul to the strangers and is helping them
carry out their tests on human guinea pigs.  As the show's hero, John
Murdoch, MRS. DALLOWAY's Rufus Sewell plays the only man who may be
able to save humanity -- or at least the city.  Or it is one and the
same?
     Jennifer Connelly, last seen in the delightful but unappreciated
INVENTING THE ABBOTTS, is John's wife, Emma.  Or is she?  You get the
idea.  Like an Escher print, the storyline twists into itself and out
again, so that what is real and what isn't become intertwined.
     As the tough but, like the audience, confused Inspector Bumstead,
William Hurt plays his usual character.  There's a mass murderer afoot
in the city, and Inspector Bumstead harbors certain suspicions about
John.
     SPICE WORLD's Richard O'Brien is the stranger named Mr. Hand, and
Ian Richardson is the leader of the strangers, Mr. Book.
     Let's stop and take a poll.  How long do you like the camera to
stay with one character before it switches to another?  20 seconds so
that the actor has a chance to say something meaningful?  10 seconds so
that we can keep a fast pace?  How about a blistering 5?  Nope, all of
these are way too slow for DARK CITY's editor, Dov Hoenig.  1 and 2
second clips are the norm in this movie.  I know because I timed them.
(My watch and I got to know each other better as a way for me to relive
my boredom.)  The result of this excessive flitting is liable to be
nausea and confusion among the audience, which is a shame since there
is a clever story trying to get out.  But with the strobe light effect
of five dozen 1-2 second clips in a row, it is hard to pay attention to
anything.
     The only real reasons for seeing the picture are the bleak
production design by George Liddle and Patrick Tatopoulos and the grimy
cinematography by Dariusz Wolski.  For those of you who thought Tim
Burton's vision of Gotham City in BATMAN was too bright and happy,
you'll like the look of DARK CITY.  (One of the oddities of this
metropolis is that time goes from midnight to midnight with no noon or
daylight in between, but the locals never notice.  It's that loss of
memory thing.)
     Liz Keogh's costumes for the strangers are memorable.  Dressed in
long black coats, wide brimmed black hats and big black gloves, their
pancake make-up keeps them ever ready for Halloween.  And shot at
angles designed to make them look seven feet tall, they appear quite
ominous.
     If the editing and the confusing direction have you ready to walk
out in the first fifteen minutes, don't fight the urge.  Yes, there are
a couple of nice twists along the way and some good visuals, but most
people can find many better things to do with their time.
     DARK CITY runs 1:43.  It is rated R for violence, nudity and
profanity and would be fine for most teenagers.

Author
Berge Garabedian
Alex Proyas' visionary follow-up to his big hit from 1994, THE CROW
(8.5/10), is a stunning success on all counts of movie-making magic.
PLOT:
Some eerie "people" named The Strangers living under a "dark city"
attempt to identify the constitution of human beings in a futuristic
setting.
CRITIQUE:
Grand vision. Out of this world special effects (not one bit of cheese
either). Deep story line that allows us to ponder the ramifications of
our childhood, memories, and future behaviour. This movie is set on a
quick pace, and doesn't let up till the very end. It's a very original
story, set to Mr. Proyas' unique style, and dark motif. I never thought
I'd see a movie that was darker than the original Crow, but here it is,
ladies and germs! Obviously, if "dark films" are not your cup o' tea, I
suggest you skip this piece of blackness.
This movie brought back images of BLADE RUNNER (7.5/10) and the
original BATMAN (8/10) (before Joel Schumacher turned the series into a
fantasy cartoon for him and his friends...) in regards to its grandeur
and scale, and certainly will be remembered in the years to come as a
cult classic. On the down side, Kiefer Sutherland's performance as the
Doctor ran a little too close to a bad impression of the Hunchback of
Notre-Dame, but I digress. The love story was also a bit weak, but then
again, if you want to see a good love story, you wouldn't go see a film
called DARK CITY in the first place, right?
Overall, I must say that this film is one that I thoroughly enjoyed
from frame one to frame last, and look very forward to watching it over
and over again, with nachos by my side, and mind set to "absorb". Try
to see this flick on the big screen, boys and girls, it will certainly
make for a stronger impression. Until then, I'm off to find a poster of
The Strangers to plaster all over my walls.
Little Known Facts: 
Film was originally titled DARK EMPIRE and DARK WORLD.
Director Proyas was apparently extremely distraught after the shooting
of THE CROW (and more specifically, the accidental shooting of his
young star, Brandon Lee) and took several years to recover. I would
venture to compare the meaning behind this film with the thoughts that
Mr. Proyas experienced for his ill-fated star.

Author
Kevin Patterson
DARK CITY
Rating: *** (out of four)
R, 1998
Directed by Alex Proyas. Written by Proyas, Lem Dobbs, and David S. Goyer.
Starring Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, William Hurt. 
DARK CITY certainly boasts one of the more interesting premises of any recent
science fiction movie: a race of powerful aliens, in an attempt to discover
what constitutes the human soul, abduct a group of people and take them to an
artificially constructed "city." Every time it turns midnight, they are all
put to "sleep" while their memories are extracted, mixed, and redistributed;
meanwhile, the city itself is redone completely as entire buildings appear and
disappear through the aliens' "tuning," the term they use for their
manipulations of physical reality. They wake up in new places with new
memories and personal histories. Assisting them in these experiments is Dr.
Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland), a human scientist who helps the aliens as they
search for any indication that someone's individual essence might withstand
the constant brain-scrambling. 
As DARK CITY begins, we learn that something has just gone wrong with the
aliens' experiment. John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) has had his memory wiped as
expected, but the implantation of new memories seems to have failed. He is
left with no identity and, more importantly, no idea what he's doing in a
hotel room with the bloody corpse of a dead prostitute. Before long, both the
"police" that the aliens have brought to the city as well as the aliens
themselves are after him as he tries to figure out who he is and whether or
not he is responsible for the woman's murder. Along the way, the aliens
discover that he is able to "tune" in the same way that they can and begin to
think that he may be the answer to their questions about human individuality.
It's an idea that occurs to the audience as well, as Murdoch does seem to
retain a certain high moral character despite the memory loss; as the
sympathetic Police Inspector Bumstead (William Hurt) notes, he doesn't seem
like a murderer, whatever the evidence against him. 
Writer/director Proyas does a wonderful job in creating the experimental city:
it is a place filled with towering skyscrapers, dark alleys, and ugly yellow
and neon-green interiors. The sun never rises (literally, since the aliens
can't stand the light), leaving everyone trapped in what seems like perpetual
and unabated gloom. It is perhaps fortunate for the human subjects that the
aliens reset everyone's memory after a day; I have no doubt that I would lose
my mind after consciously spending more than about a week in this place. This
nightmarish atmosphere is perfectly suited to the story, immersing the
audience in the same sense of paranoia that Murdoch feels as he tries to
convince himself of his own innocence and seeks the sympathy of his supposed
wife (Jennifer Connelly) and Bumstead. Proyas adds plenty of clever touches to
add to Murdoch's frustration as he looks for answers. At one point, for
example, he asks someone what train will take him out of the city, to which
the person responds, "You want the express." He waits for the express, only to
see it fly past him without stopping; when he asks another bystander why it
didn't stop, the man casually explains, "That's the express." 
Unfortunately, DARK CITY is weakened by a rushed and incomplete ending that
ignores a major plot element (and in a way that lends itself to truly eerie
implications - see below for spoilers) as Proyas, like any sensible Hollywood
director, decides that since he's put together these impressive sets and
visual designs, he might as well blow them up before he's finished. In the
process, he leaves us with quite a few lingering questions. Do *all* humans
have a "soul" to speak of, or just Murdoch (since he can "tune") and the other
few who are able to resist the aliens? Why are the aliens so sloppy with their
experiment as to leave everyone with only vague and confused understandings of
their present situation - didn't they realize people would get antsy when they
couldn't even figure out how to leave the city? Why do all of them have names
like "Mr. Hand", "Mr. Book", and "Mr. Quick"? Why did they design the city
like something out of a 1940s noir film? And if they're advanced enough to
manipulate physical reality, couldn't they have found some way around their
intolerance of light and thus avoided another dead giveaway for anyone who got
suspicious? 
The answer for some of these questions, of course, is probably that Proyas
shares the fascination of several of his contemporaries, such as Tim Burton,
with this Gothic comic-book atmosphere and visual design. (If that's the case,
however, he could have taken lessons from Burton, who in the BATMAN films
managed to create unease and dread even in broad daylight, and solved at least
one of his plot holes.) That's not to say that these dark, gloomy images are
wasted: they come through with a definite visceral power that puts DARK CITY
only one shelf below Terry Gilliam's BRAZIL and David Lynch's LOST HIGHWAY in
the library of Psychologically Disturbing Films. But unlike those films, which
rested on a subjective, mind's-eye viewpoint, DARK CITY seems to have
underlying explanations which, while they may be science fiction, fit into the
framework of linear narrative. Once Proyas has chosen this expository
technique, the narrative demands that he follow through on it completely, and
he doesn't. 
Proyas seems to have quite a gift for haunting, atmospheric filmmaking; the
visual design and direction in DARK CITY are second to none. Perhaps once he
finds a top-notch screenplay, he will join the ranks of Burton, Gilliam, and
others as a first-rate fantasy filmmaker. Until then, DARK CITY still holds
its own as a refreshingly bizarre and original film that is sure to please
fans of science fiction or of psychological thrillers. 
- - - -SPOILER WARNING (Do not read further unless you want the ending and
other plot points revealed)- - - - 
Perhaps the biggest problem with DARK CITY is the final sequence in which
Murdoch has gained control over the aliens' technology and uses it to
re-"tune" the city so that now there is daylight, people can leave the city
and go to the beach, etc. Isn't he even going to *try* to pilot the city,
which has turned out to be a spaceship, back to Earth? What about recovering
everyone's original memory? Schreber apparently couldn't do this, but
presumably the aliens kept records of who everyone was before all this
started, or else they flunked high school lab science on their home planet. It
would have been fine for the screenplay to address these questions at the end
but not answer them, but instead it ignores them altogether. 
Moreover, is this really a "happy" ending, as its upbeat tone seems to
suggest? If it is, it potentially subverts whatever message the film was
trying to convey. No one else but Murdoch seems to know what's happened. Is
everything OK simply because the mutable city is now in the hands of a
supposedly more benevolent overlord, i.e. Murdoch? Seems to me like we're
right back where we started - a group of alien abductees is trapped in an
artificial reality controlled by a powerful being with the ability to "tune"
reality. Now, I don't really think this was Proyas's intention, but he should
have been more careful. 

Author
Jerry Bosch
Bad, bad, bad. Am I talking to a dog? In a word, yes.
Amnesia can be a curse or a blessing. To a guy who can't even remember who
he is not, amnesia would be a bad thing, but to a movie audience, at times,
it can be an unforgettable benediction.
Dark City wants to be a serious movie. It wants to probe the mysteries of
the soul by addressing the issues of identity and alternate realities
through a novel and not uninteresting variation on the amnesia theme. But a
cinematic style that aims for Kafkaesque obscurity and ambiguity succeeds
only in projecting a comic book atmosphere due to the flatness of the
characters and the sharp demarcation of the plot line. You know that the
characters are confused, but you don't feel their pain. And should you feel
confused about their confusion, not to worry, everything is explained via
dialogue or voice over. But alas, the mysteries of the soul can not be
plumbed in the absence of pathos. So we end up with a moderately
interesting premise that services the plot line without probing the thesis
to any substantial depth.
It seems that Alex Proyas (director) was unable to decide between the
fractured logic of a dream-like state and his desire to clarify the
situation. What the characters fail to show us they tell us in so many
words; which seems like a commitment to logic, yet the premise is rife with
logical inconsistencies. The busy metropolis has millions of inhabitants,
yet the good bad doctor in charge of human experimentation shows no signs
of having a staff. He seems to operate by himself in motel rooms. And why
should the hero's brain mimic the powers of the Strangers, when he was not
exposed to the substance of their minds? And why were those powers not used
in a consistent manner?
The water connection could have been used as a powerful symbol of the soul
which, like water, will slip between your fingers when you try to grab it.
However water does not play a major role in the defeat of the aliens. The
victory weapon is not any element of the human soul, but elements
indigenous to the aliens themselves, which is not particularly flattering
to the human spirit. The final psycho-kinetic duel is a "been there; done
that" experience which contributes nothing to the premise, and certainly
does nothing to support a dualistic argument about the mind and the soul. 
Regarding William Hurt, the bank that holds his mortgage is glad to see him
working again. Keifer Sutherland limps an affects a halting speech in the
finest tradition of high school melodrama. Rufus Sewell and Jennifer
Connelly turn in workman-like performances.
Dark City will be OK to watch at home when it comes to Blockbuster. Just
make sure to gather many friends in order to justify the expense. As food
for the mind, it is little more than psy-fi pizza.
I have been known to doze off in Titanic and other worthy epics. This often
happens when my allergic conjunctivitis meets a darkened room. In Dark City
the house was dark, the screen was dark, the action was slow and my
conjunctivae were eyelash deep in memories of pollen. Perhaps I missed the
good parts. It would be nice if there were such a thing as conjunctival
amnesia.

Author
Matt Williams
Dark City is an intriguing mixture of science fiction and film noir.
Based on an original story by director Alex Proyas, the film has the
look and feel of a modern comic book adaptation, but with much more
substance.
Rufus Sewell stars as John Murdoch, a man who wakes up in a strange
hotel room with no memory.  His only clue to his former identity is a
sunny postcard from a locale about which it seems everyone has a fuzzy
memory.
However Mr. Murdoch's quest for his identity is hampered by two things:
he is wanted for a series of grisly murders by Inspector Bumstead
(William Hurt), and a mysterious group of pale bald men in trenchcoats
are hunting him down. For some reason, unknown to Murdoch, they want him
dead.
These men, called The Strangers, have the abilities to stop time and
alter reality, a process they call "tuning". Aided and abetted by one
human, Dr. Shreber (Kiefer Sutherland), their motives are mysterious and
unknown, but can certainly come to no good.
The film's gothic looks and hardcore science fiction elements are both a
weakness and a strength.  The bizarre atmosphere are likely to be very
off-putting to mainstream audiences, who will be missing a good film.
At the same time, however, those same traits give the film all the
earmarks of being a lasting "cult" hit.
While the film may be strange and out of the ordinary, the plot is by no
means hard to follow.  With several characters in the dark, the film
does a good job at slowly revealing itself to them and to the audience.
Still, there are plenty of questions left unresolved.  For example, why
isn't anybody ever accidentally harmed during the "tuning"? It also
seems that more people in the city should notice the discontinuities
that occur during the night.
Overall, the cast does a good job at evoking the appropriate atmosphere.
Rufus Sewell gives a decent, if understated, performance as the film's
everyman.  Jennifer Connelly and William Hurt are underused, but
enjoyable while they're onscreen.  Kiefer Sutherland's breathless
delivery is  more annoying than innovative.  As the lead Strangers, Ian
Richardson and Richard O'Brien are creepily effective.
You would think that the cinematography and special effects of Dark City
should be its strongest point.  But while they are good,  Dark City's
true strength is in it's story which thoughtfully examines the changing
facets of identity, memory and perception.
Don't be put off by the film's gothic imagery and bizarre themes. If you
do, you'll be missing an enjoyable, if strange, film.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 New Line Cinema
 Director:  Alex Proyas
 Writer:  Alex Proyas, Lem Dobbs
 Cast: William Hurt, Rufus Sewell, Richard O'Brien, Kiefer
Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, Ian Richardson
   "I can do anything I want just so long as I concentrate,"
brags John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) in Australian director Alex
Proyas's movie, the director's lunge to duplicate Fritz Lang's
fame.  The director does not quite share his hero's worthy
attribute: focused though he may be on providing a classic
tale of the woes of conformity and the benefits of individuality,
he succeeds principally in creating visual grandeur.  Perhaps
that's more than enough, as Proyas's targeted audience is
probably the 17-25 year old set who dig the sophisticated
comic books which have emerged during the past two
decades. 
   Proyas's devotees, mavens of the sci-fi-horror genre, have
looked forward to the release of this film, having adored his
best known work, "The Crow" (1994), which became known
far beyond the intended audience because of a tragedy which
took place on the set. In that film Brandon Lee, in the role of
Eric Draven--who, with the help of a crow seeks vengeance
after he and his fiancee are murdered--was accidentally killed
just before the conclusion from a gunshot wound, digital
magic allowing him to complete the job after his demise.  Like
"The Crow," "Dark City has a visual style courtesy of
cinematographer Dariusz Wolski which owes much to the
study of comic books, called graph novels by their
fans.  Using extreme motions to evoke the most startling
effects, Wolski would swoop high above his city and then
suddenly dip, exploiting shadows, and creating an
expressionistic embellishment of edifices.  This mobility has
an effect that would greatly please Charlie Chaplin, whose
"Modern Times" (1936) attacks the impersonality of the
machine age and Fritz Lang, whose "Metropolis" (1926)
fantasizes a futuristic city and its mechanized society with an
upper-class young man's abandonment of a life of luxury to
join oppressed workers in a revolt.
   Few would argue that Proyas's plots take precedence over
his visual perceptions.  This time around, though, Proyas
transcends the simple story of vengeance which drives "The
Crow" and reaches for a more transcendent motif:
humankind's struggle for individuality against the pressures of
conformity.  Ayn Rand would be proud of him.  His principal
character, John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell), finds himself in a
seedy hotel, awakening to find a dead prostitute in his room,
and soon discovers he is wanted for a series of brutal killings
of women in the same profession.  He remembers nothing,
however, unaware of his guilt or innocence in the slayings. 
He might as well be a reborn babe, springing to existence yet
thrust immediately into the throes of mid-life crisis.  He may or
may not be married to the lovely Emma (Jennifer Connelly)
but is told that he has become estranged from her because of
her alleged affairs with other men.  Murdoch is pursued by an
obsessed police inspector, Frank Bumstead (William Hurt),
and by a far more dangerous trackers known as The
Strangers. These Magritte-style, conjunctivitis-afflicted
refugees from a Charles Addams strip came from another
world where they are dying of conformity and seek to enter
the bodies of earthlinks whom they are studying with the help
of Dr. Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland).  
   Anyone over the age of twenty-five is likely to be confused
by the plot logistics, which involve the imprinting of memories
(via injections straight into the forehead) and by the strange
manner of speaking of the weird Dr. Shreber, who seems to
utter three words at a time, pause, and then continue his
perplexing train of thought.  His vocal pattern mimics the
jaggedness of the story line, though we do learn that he is in
effect a double agent, pretending to help The Strangers while
actually helping Murdoch to drive them out of the city. The
Strangers relentlessly pursue John because he is the one
human being who shares their ability to do Tuning: to alter the
environment (allowing doors to appear out of nowhere in brick
walls, shoving tall buildings together at will, even changing the
architecture from contemporary to art deco and redesigning
room, creating palatial splendor from a workman's hovel.
   As The Strangers fly blithely through the air, bald heads
gleaming, eyes turning redder while they are enveloped in a
sickly-green light, we may appreciate the special effects
(created in a Sydney, Australia studio) as we watch a city
which seems to emerge from the 1940s turn into a cold,
impersonal, machine-like organism.  But we've been there
before.  We've seen albino-style bogeyman in the
cheaply-made 1950s sci-fi thrillers, and our vampire pictures
have processed ghouls who like The Strangers shun light,
humanity, and bright colors.  Sewell does well, however, as
the terminally scared prey who must use his frightful powers
against the Strangers, though the 6'3" William Hurt seems
embarrassed by his role as an inspector with a penchant for
detail, in no way the sort of characterization he has enjoyed in
three-dimensional plots such as "The Big Chill" and in the
more compelling sci-fi adventure, "Altered States."  
   Even the slogan used to rouse the heroes to action has
been used before, by New York's Mayor Giuliani, who
pledged successfully to "take back our city."

Author
Boyd Petrie
Dark City (1998)
Rated R for violence, gore, nudity, and some mild profanity.
----------  Out of 4 stars: **** (4 Stars)
Starring: Rufus Sewell, William Hurt, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer
Connelly, Richard O'Brien, and Ian Richardson.
In 1994, a film was released which became a major box office success
mostly due to the controversy surrounding the picture.  This film was
THE CROW, and its star, Brandon Lee, was killed due a faulty blank
bullet.  The dark mood of the film and its story was given a haunting
twist due to the loss of its star.  The director, Alex Proyas, used
special effects to finish the film without Lee, and audiences flocked
to see how Proyas would end the movie.  However, what was most
startling aspect wasn't the controversy, but its rich atmosphere.
This film marked the beginning of a director's career that would only
grow with his next film.
DARK CITY is a highly anticipated film which deals with a subject that
requires thinking to be done in the theater.  Science fiction films
have been the genre most widely known for creating thought-provoking
subjects.  However, due to the success of big-budget films such as
INDEPENDENCE DAY and MEN IN BLACK, thoughtful science fiction films
have become a thing of the past in pursuit of more expensive and loud
films.  If you don't believe me, just look at the good science fiction
movies which have done poorly at the box office (THE ARRIVAL and
GATTACA to name a couple).  And from the look of the film, DARK CITY
will follow on the same path as those films.
The film itself is a step up from Proyas' debut film, with a better
story, better production values, and a terrifyingly realistic premise.
It's still science fiction, but many of the ideas underlying the film
can be interpreted into our own lives.  Beginning with an interesting
monologue from an unseen character, we are told that a race of aliens
have discovered the planet Earth.  The narrator likes to refer to them
as The Strangers, as they have a ghost-like quality to them.  The main
plot begins in a small, cramped room, with only one light swinging
overhead.  A man lies naked in a bathtub, and suddenly awakens,
startled to find himself there.  This man is afflicted with amnesia,
but more startling is the dead prostitute in the bedroom.  He grabs
some clothes from a chair, and finds a set of keys in the pocket.  A
phone call interrupts the silence, and the voice on the other line
belongs to a Dr. Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland), telling him to get out
of the apartment quickly.  He complies, and as he leaves, the elevator
opens to reveal three ominous, pale figures.
He discovers that his name is John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell), and that he
has a wife, Emma (Jennifer Connelly).  At home, however, he finds
Inspector Frank Bumstead (William Hurt) waiting to question him about
the murder.  Since not even remembering committing it, Murdoch flees,
but finds himself in an even more precarious situation.  At midnight,
exactly, as he tries to find Dr. Schreber, all the noises in the city
stop.  As he watches, the clocks stop moving, people fall asleep at
the wheel of their cars, and trains stop running.  Then, he watches as
several Strangers walk out of a door which has appeared from a wall.
Dr. Schreber follows.  The confusion only increases when the city
becomes alive, as buildings sprout out of the ground.
Revealing any more of the plot would spoil the mystery, and the
mystery is what keeps the story buoyant.  It seems that many of the
great science fiction films are about the unknown (2001: A SPACE
ODYSSEY, CONTACT).  DARK CITY uses its mystery to wonderful effect,
and ends with a surprise ending that doesn't seem contrived or forced.
Instead, it finishes the film with a flourish, giving another level of
meaning for us to ponder over.  And by the end of the film, DARK CITY
equals the many classics of the past, such as BLADE RUNNER and
SOLARIS.  Many people won't like the film because it may seem like a
muddled mess, but it isn't.  Many critics don't like the almost
non-existent lighting, but that has a purpose in the film.  The film
noir setting is emphasized by the darkness, and an entire plot twist
centers around the everlasting darkness.  Critics who complain about
the film obviously aren't thinking during the film, and this spoils
their enjoyment.  DARK CITY entertains while hiding the message under
its visually impressive surface.
Alex Proyas has constructed a masterfully ingenious science fiction
film which toys with the imagination while preaching to its audience.
His thoughts on humanity are never easy to grasp, and yet they are a
basic function of our human lives.  This simplistic approach becomes
frightening as we realize that we as human beings are really like the
characters portrayed in the film.  Proyas, who also wrote the
screenplay, never asks any easy questions, and the answers are left
for us to determine.  Proyas' direction maintains the steady monotony
of darkness, but the film never gets boring.  There is quite enough
action to maintain anyone's attention, including some awe-inspiring
chase sequences that had me cheering with delight.  The pace of the
film is so tight and so continuous that one wishes Proyas would have
stretched the running time even more.  Several of the scenes seem
quickly cut, and Proyas could have taken more time with each scene
(but this is just a minor flaw).
Then, there are the special effects.  No science fiction film goes
without them, and what makes the thought-provoking science fiction
films separate from the destroy-everything-on-screen films is simple:
the special effects in the latter group are more obvious.  When a film
uses special effects to its advantage, everyone should take note.
Everyone seemed to have with TITANIC, but that's only the tip of the
iceberg (pardon the pun).  DARK CITY uses special effects so
flawlessly, that many people forget that they are effects.  I am one
of those people.  The effects are so seamless that it's hard to tell
what is and what isn't real.  When the buildings twist and bend, you
find yourself submerged in the story and characters so much that the
effects seem realistic.  When a film can suspend your belief by making
everything as real as possible, it deserves to be noticed.
As with all films, the cast is an essential part to the overall
impact.  If the wrong cast is chosen, the film won't have the same
impression.  DARK CITY has a top-notch cast, with zany characters and
terrific performances all-around.  Leading is Rufus Sewell who turns
in a solid performance on an ever-growing and impressive resume.  In
1996, he appeared in HAMLET as Fortinbras, and in 1995's COLD COMFORT
FARM.  He can also be seen in the recent Dangerous Beauty.  Sewell
commands the screen, never letting anything overpower his presence.
William Hurt also turns in a rather humorous performance as the older
Inspector, who is baffled by the mystery unfolding before him.  Kiefer
Sutherland portrays Dr. Schreber with a frightened sense of knowledge.
He is the only human being who knows what is going on, and his rasping
breath gives his character an almost haunting sound.  Jennifer
Connelly is perfect as the film noir-ish vixen, unable to understand
the mad rantings of her husband (and yet she still loves him).  Then,
there are the Strangers.  The most prominent are Richard O'Brien (from
THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW fame) and Ian Richardson who appeared in
the visually-similar BRAZIL.  The Strangers speak in monotone and
eerie voices, almost like an echo coming of the walls.  Overall, an
impressive cast to accentuate the style.
DARK CITY is rated R for violence and gore, nudity, and some light
profanity.  DARK CITY could have easily been rated PG-13, though the
subject itself may have warranted an R rating.  With sets that
resemble BLADE RUNNER and other various science fiction films, many
people are likely to think that DARK CITY merely copied those other
films.  However, the story presented is true to life, and the result
is an original film that has something to say.  Of course, as my
philosophy goes towards science fiction films, DARK CITY won't find a
big audience, and that's a real shame.  DARK CITY deserves to be
watched again and again.  The visuals are rich and dark, the style is
gloomy but not overwhelming, and the action is top-notch.  This is
already one of the year's best movies, and it deserves to be held as
an early Oscar contender.
Reviewed by Respect (respect@aros.net)
http://www.aros.net/~respect/movies.html

Author
Scott Renshaw
DARK CITY
(New Line)
Starring:  Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, William
Hurt, Richard O'Brien, Ian Richardson.
Screenplay:  Alex Proyas and Lem Dobbs and David S. Goyer.
Producers:  Andrew Mason and Alex Proyas.
Director:  Alex Proyas.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A little over an hour into DARK CITY, three of the film's central
characters sit in a small boat, rowing slowly through a canal.  John
Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) is a man who wakes up one night to find himself a
suspect in a series of murders, though he has no memory of his past;
Detective Bumstead (William Hurt) is the officer investigating the crimes;
Dr. Daniel Screber (Kiefer Sutherland) is a mysterious psychiatrist.  As
they row row row their boat, Schreber explains in detail how he was forced
to serve a group of sinister, nattily-dressed extra-terrestrials known as
The Strangers.  Through the use of their awesome power to manipulate
reality -- called "tuning" -- The Strangers have constructed an artificial
city as a massive test environment, playing with the lives and memories of
human subjects to discover what makes them human.  Only Murdoch, whose own
nascent "tuning" abilities allow him to block The Strangers' control, can
help free the Dark City from its dark overlords.
     Sutherland prattles on with his plot summary for around five minutes,
his wheezing, mannered Peter Lorre-meets-The Elephant Man delivery growing
more insufferable by the moment, his character rapidly becoming something
akin to AUSTIN POWERS' Sir Basil Exposition.  It's the sort of lazy,
aggravating scene which is all too common in science-fiction/fantasy
films, but in DARK CITY it's even more aggravating.  You see, Sutherland's
interminable synopsis consists of three distinct sub-categories:  1) stuff
already explicitly stated in the equally lazy opening narration; 2) stuff
which should have been painfully easy to show rather than tell; 3) stuff a
viewer should have been able to figure out by actually watching the
preceding hour instead of waiting for someone to give him the gist of it.
     And therein one can spot why it's a bad idea to take a dark
existential thriller and pitch it at 15-year-olds.  Director and co-writer
Alex Proyas (THE CROW) begins with several intriguing ideas -- the nature
of identity, love as present experience versus collected experience,
modern paranoia about loss of control -- but he seems so afraid of losing
his audience that he keeps slowing down to allow the stragglers to catch
up.  Every time DARK CITY begins building towards a sense of mystery or
menace, a convenient, prosaic bit of dialogue breaks the spell to start
spelling everything out.  When Proyas isn't afraid of losing his audience,
he's afraid of boring them, which means that the climax of his
psychological study becomes a ridiculously chaotic battle in which Sewell
and veteran British actor Ian Richardson (as The Strangers' leader) go at
it like Karloff and Price in THE RAVEN, staring each other down as waves
of psychic energy, unfortunately by-standing Strangers and clouds of
debris swirl around them.
     I can't even work up much enthusiasm for the look of DARK CITY, with
its pale, bald antagonists and a few morphing twists added to the
bleak-chic cityscapes of modern science-fantasy.  Despite its brief
flirtations with profound philosophical questions, it's really just
another good-looking vessel in which a cast of second-tier stars
(Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly) and slumming "serious actors" (Sewell,
Richardson, Hurt) is asked to rattle around for 90 minutes until the
special effects budget runs out.  It didn't necessarily have to be like
that, not with a provocative premise as promising as that of BLADE RUNNER.
It simply takes guts to let a premise like that play itself out, the kind
of guts studio executives generally don't have.  I wouldn't be surprised
to find out that word came down to Proyas to compromise his vision, to
create something virtually impossible to walk out of saying "I don't get
it."  That kind of story-telling buys you long, slow boat rides down a
cinematic canal, where explorations of a shattered human mindscape give
way to the pointless tour-guide ramblings of Sir Kiefer Exposition.

Author
Shane Burridge
I'm reluctant to put my thoughts of this film into writing.  My 
immediate impression of DARK CITY after viewing it is.well, an 
immediate impression.  It works like a dream: you dream something, you 
wake up with it vividly in your memory, a couple of hours later you 
remember its non-submersible images or emotions, a couple of days later 
its impact is almost completely gone.  Right now it has been three hours 
since I watched DARK CITY, and already its hypnopompic residue is 
settling somewhere in a dark, limbic city of my own.  That's fine by me.  
I don't want to go poking around in there just for the sake of analysis.
But it's safe enough to recount the fundamentals: This is 
writer-director Alex Proyas' followup to THE CROW (which in itself could 
have been titled DARK CITY).  Its most striking feature, like its 
predecessor, is its sepulchral photography, although DARK CITY may be 
even darker (but at least without all that rain): it seems that every 
wall is painted black or grey, every shadow overwhelms the light sources 
within the frame, every character is etched in chiaroscuro.  It's not 
just a noir gimmick.  Like the startling visual effects, the look of the 
film is entirely in service with its storyline: the titular city is part 
machine, part terrarium, part psychoid unconscious.  It's as Jung would 
have dreamed it himself - a place where the basic stories of our world 
might begin with a singular creative experience.
The city's governorship is in the hands of powerful beings known only as 
The Strangers (imagine a costume party where everyone shows up as 
Nosferatu and you'll get the basic idea), who impose mandatory 
hibernation periods upon its human residents.  It's when one of the 
citizens (Rufus Sewell) remains awake that the film begins.  Thenceforth 
a lot of strange stuff happens in DARK CITY, and Proyas stretches out 
the intrigue for just the right length.  Its arresting visuals and 
thundering soundtrack - this film must be heard in a cinema, not just 
seen in one - drive its narrative at a compelling pace, although the 
purely cinematic sensibility of it all makes Sewell and the other actors 
hardly memorable; only Keifer Sutherland's mannered performance stands 
out afterwards, for better or worse. 
The most noticeable thing about DARK CITY is that it makes perfect sense 
as an experience, but not as a story.  Here we have an alien gestalt 
capable of manifesting its consciousness; for all intents and purposes 
they appear invulnerable.  Yet they may be felled by a blow to the head 
just as easily as any of the humans in their charge.  As a friend of 
mine remarked, if the aliens had this kind of power then why didn't they 
arm themselves with psychically-generated rocket launchers instead of 
their less effective psychically-generated knives?  It's a fair point, 
and one which in turn leads to many other questions about the 
screenplay.  But it would do just as well to question why, in a dream, 
you see yourself flattened under a truck loaded with baked beans only to 
be relocated in front of a classroom of talking raccoons a split second 
later (this may be a stupid example, but at least it's a real dream).  
Putting it plainly, to question the logic of this film is simply 
unsporting.  Pick at one loose thread and you'll find that the story's 
entire fabric is made entirely of the same.  Nevertheless, Proyas makes 
the bold choice of establishing the feel of a 1940s detective movie, 
thus providing us with characters that are investigating his project's 
own meaning.  Admirable, when you realize it would have been a lot 
simpler for him to take a leaf out of David Lynch's book and cite the 
illogicality of dreams as his nightmarish film's raison d'etre.  
When I was a kid I used to drive myself crazy thinking about the 
universe - how big it was, where it ended, if it ended, what it was in 
when it ended (a bubble, maybe?  If so, what was the bubble floating 
in?).  There were times when DARK CITY reminded me of that feeling.  
It's a metanarrative intrigue into those huge creative spaces: the 
fabrication of storylines and scenarios, the endless possibilities and 
invention of characters and their relationships.  We're outside looking 
in, but at the same time there's a sense that this film has come from 
somewhere within and is projecting itself out.  It's easy to backtrack 
and point out a film history from which DARK CITY may have emerged - its 
seething architecture is mindful of BRAZIL and BLADE RUNNER, its 
existential vogue is similar to early Lars von Trier or Jeunet and Caro, 
etc, etc - but this kind of cross-referencing can go on forever.  I've 
resisted temptation to draw parallels this time around.  Let's face it, 
the only necessary base for comparison is much more primal: namely, our 
own dark cities.  You know the ones.  Just like in the film, they're 
torn down and rebuilt every night in our sleep.


Author
David Sunga
Written by: Alex Proyas, Lem Dobbs and David S. Goyer
Starring: Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, William
Hurt
Ingredients: 
Man with amnesia who wakes up wanted for murder, dark science fiction
city controlled by alien beings with mental powers. 
Synopsis: 
What if you woke up one day, and suspected you were not on Earth, and
instead were part of an experiment in a giant space terrarium
manipulated by intergalactic alien zookeepers? In DARK CITY John Murdoch
(Rufus Sewell) has this problem. 
DARK CITY starts out like a 1940s noir amnesia detective mystery. Poor
John wakes up with amnesia in a hotel room with a dead dame in one
corner. A mysterious phone call tells him to get the heck out of there,
and soon enough John is chased all over town by a murderous army of pale
people in black trench-coats, as well as by the police, and the dogged
Inspector Bumstead (William Hurt). Is John a murderer, and what can his
missing memories tell him? He searches through his own wallet for
possible contacts and clues. But when the clues don't fit, it doesn't
just confuse him; it causes John to go so far as to question the whole
nature of reality in the Dark City.
To John, something is fishy, and very unreal about this city. How come
it's always dark, and nobody seems to remember what they did this
morning? And how come nobody seems to remember how to leave the city, or
how to get to nearby Shell Beach? Every night, around midnight, John
notices that the whole city enters a state of suspended animation, and
at this time, creepy alien experimenters known as the 'Strangers' come
out and do nasty things like inject fake memories into people's heads
with big hypodermic needles. The Strangers have the ability to 'tune,'
or warp reality using telepathic powers.
Turns out, the city is not on Earth at all. And the reason why John
doesn't fall victim to the nightly suspended animation, is because he is
a human mutation that possesses the same god-like reality-warping
abilities as the Strangers. Even with the help of scientist Dr. Daniel
Schreber, can John take back the DARK CITY?
Opinion:
Director Alex Proyas (he also directed THE CROW) mentions this in the
DARK CITY press kit: In films, science fiction is always "used to have
big spaceships blow up cities. I think we're a little tired of that."
According to director Proyas, probably the most interesting thing about
DARK CITY is its layers. It's designed so that you can watch the film
over again, and examine it from the perspective of a main character
other than Murdoch. It's a philosophical piece.
Cinematic science fiction is basically a thinly disguised shootout
between the good humans and the bad aliens (whether they be Klingons,
giant bugs, or proponents of the dark side of the Force). But science
fiction in books reaches beyond the 'shoot-em-up' level and targets the
big questions, questions like who are we? What is the human condition?
What is ethical? What would a true human being do?
Far from comic book style on the order of SPAWN, BATMAN, or THE MUTANT
NINJA TURTLES, DARK CITY not only features the showdown between good
humans and powerful aliens, but it also asks questions worthy of films
such as BRAZIL or BLADE RUNNER.
DARK CITY is what philosophers would call an existentialist screenplay.
A little more than 200 years ago, the world was filled with unhappy
peasants - - unhappy because nearly every aspect of their lives was
controlled by totalitarian, military, conformist, medieval regimes. The
people took refuge in religion, the idea being that earthly life was a
time of suffering, but after death, Heaven would be available.
Meanwhile, the State used these same ideas to prop up their regimes; the
King was often head of the religion and therefore sanctioned by Heaven.
When science finally overturned religion, the medieval dictatorships
came tumbling down and were replaced by democratic governments. But the
new fear was that the power of science and experimentation would be used
to create a world order as darkly totalitarian as the old. This is the
time period when writers and philosophers such as Freud, Kant, Kafka,
Nietzsche, and Dostoevsky pondered what society should be, and what
place the individual had in it. The existentialists' in particular wrote
about the power of the lone individual against what may be a hostile,
indifferent, or alienated universe.
In DARK CITY, when the last dying, defeated alien asks John Murdoch why
the aliens' scientific experiments on the human beings' brains failed,
Murdoch replies, pointing to his head, "Because the human condition
isn't located in here." 

Author
kwisatz haderach
"Dark City"
A SCIENCE FICTION WORLD review, (C) 1999/2000 KWISATZ HADERACH.
Visit SCIENCE FICTION WORLD: WWW.SFWORLD.ONLINEHOME.DE
Cast: Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connely, Richard O'Brien,
Ian Richardson, William Hurt
Director/Author: Alex Proyas
Producers: Alex Proyas & Andrew Mason
Origin: USA/Australia 1998
Duration: 103 minutes
"Dark City" is a very special movie. Published in 1998 it creates a very
interesting atmosphere by using many good ideas from different
sf-novels, -short-stories and -movies. For me it can be described best as a
mixture of Franz Kafka and Philip K. Dick. Maybe that's the main reason why
I like the movie that much.
The movie starts with the main character John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) lying
sleeping in a bath. Very soon he awakes and recognizes that he has lost his
memory. Neither can he remember who he is nor where. He gets to know that is
in a strange hotel and after a while he finds out that he is wanted for a
series of brutal and very bizarre murders. In panic he leaves the house to
find himself on the dark and cold street near a ringing telephone. He
answers the telephone and a man who introduces himself as Dr. Schreiber
(Kiefer Sutherland) tells him that something has gone wrong and that he has
to hide because "they" are searching for him and that they must not get him.
Although he flees the same moment "they" are able to find him shortly
afterwards. Being attacked by them he uses the ability to "tune" that means
to use a supernatural power which originally only "them" had. This power
allows him to make things happen while only thinking of them. He did not
knew that he had those power but now he has a weapon to defend himself. Of
course he tries to find out the following: Who am I ? Why do I have those
powers ? Why are "they" hunting me ?
In the further story he gets to know that he is the only human in the dark
city who has such powers and that these powers must be a result of the
failed experiment that "they" had done to him. What he also gets to know is
that the whole city is used by the aliens as a big labor to study human
behaviour. "They" are from a dying race which believe it's only chance to
survive is to find out what makes humans humane. To study the humans "they"
have brought some ten thousand of them to a synthetic city which drives
through space. From where they have been kidnapped no one knows. But on the
asteroid only the city exists there's nothing around it although all people
of the believe so. Only our main character realises that but he is always on
the run so that he can not be caught and he doesn't know how or if he can
change the things. "Shell-Beach", in the memories of many people of the town
a wonderful place, doesn't exist too. It is false as nearly all the peoples
memories are.
Every night at 12 o'clock the strangers stop all motion in the city and all
the human inhabitants fall asleep from one second to another. The strangers
then visit all humans sleeping and manipulate their memories with the help
of Dr. Schneider by injecting a special liquid directly into the people's
brains. Every portion of the liquid includes new memories which erases the
old ones. So when the people finally awake they are absolutely sure that
they are someone else, have another job and another personal history. The
strangers' work is perfect which means that "they" are not only changing the
people's memories but that they also change their environment. The whole
environment is changed in that way that it fits the people's new image of
themselves including photographs of their last holidays which have never
taken place but their wrong memory tells them that it has been and the
photographs or other things confirm their belief.
The strangers who are searching for the secret of humanity, for the "soul"
as they call it, have a collective conscience similar to the borg in "Star
Trek". While hunting John Murdoch everyone of them gets to know when and
where he is found by someone of the collective. But by using his
tuning-abilities he is always able to escape from them.
On his run step by step he finds out all the secrets of the dark city and of
their "owners". He discerns that "they" can not cope with sunlight and that
"they" hate every form of water. That is also the reason why there has never
been a day, never been a ray of light in the dark city. The whole town lives
in an endless night although the human inhabitants believe that they live a
"normal" live with day and night because of their synthetic memories.
During one of the nightly tuning-sessions John Murdoch meets Dr. Schneider
who tells him the whole story and promises to help him. "They" are finally
able to find him because one of "them" has been injected the same memories
he has and so he is able to think just like Murdoch. Threatening his "wife"
(also a false memory) Emma Murdoch (Jennifer Connely) they force him to give
up. Although he knows that she is not his real wife he loves her and to save
her he accepts to be captured. In "their" central "they" want Dr. Schneider
to let his spirit melt with "their" collective conscience but doc Schneider
injects him something else which makes him even more powerful. With the help
of those new powers he faces "their" leader in a final fight and as he wins
he is in the city's control. He frees the dark city and lets the sun shine,
in the end he creates shell-beach where he meets his "wife" again.
Although "Dark City" uses a lot of old ideas from Kafka, Dick, Star Trek and
many others it is able to create an own atmosphere and a very special dark
and mysterious mute. Maybe the single ideas aren't new but in this special
mixture they are ingenious. Many critics accused Alex Proyas, the author and
director of "Dark City", of having created a movie which looks really good
but which story isn't worth to talk about. They said that he has
concentrated himself too much on the visual effects and therefore has
forgotten the content. In my opinion it is true that the backgrounds of
"Dark City" are fabulous and that they can be best compared with "Blade
Runner" which is a real compliment for every movie. But I don't think that
Proyas has forgotten the content. Not only that the movie has a very intense
atmosphere it has also a story which in my eyes is worth to think and talk
about. The music fits the style and mute of the movie perfectly, it is dark,
mysterious and powerful. I can't remember who composed that music but
whoever it was he has done a really good job. Regarding the movie as whole
"Dark City" is in fact one of the best science-fiction movies ever, watch it
!
A SCIENCE FICTION WORLD review, (C) 1999/2000 KWISATZ HADERACH.
e-mail:  KWISATZ-HADERACH@GMX.NET
Visit SCIENCE FICTION WORLD WWW.SFWORLD.ONLINEHOME.DE : more than 60 other
movies reviewed and rated, illustrated by 200 pictures and photographs.
------- End of forwarded message -------

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     It was a dark and ominous night.  The city was a dangerous place
that had no pity for the weak.  An alien race "older than time" but now
on the brink of dying out had came to the city to observe humans hoping
to learn something that would enable them to save themselves.  John
Murdoch awoke in a bathtub to find he had no memories and there was a
murdered woman nearby with mystical symbols carved into her body.
Somewhere a clock was striking midnight.
     The images and the ideas come and go almost that fast in DARK
CITY.  This is a film that owes its style not so much to other films
but to European New Wave comic books.  A new idea or a piece of visual
excitement flashes by the viewer at a rate of about two a minute.  This
is certainly an impressive style of film-making but it does carry with
it a risk.  In a story in which anything can happen at any time it is
hard to care what is happening at any moment.  DARK CITY will never be
remembered as a thumping good story, but the film has other rewards.
Stylistically the film is a lot like CITY OF LOST CHILDREN or BRAZIL,
but without the sympathetic characters of those films.  So the dynamic
of the film is not to make the viewer feel much empathy for the
characters but just to wonder what will happen next, what will it mean,
and what will it look like.  In fact, the city itself is the most
engaging and certainly the most dynamic character of the film.  The
city looks like something out of the 30s and it is invested with
aliens, human-looking but pale and hairless dressed in black bowlers
and black fur-collared coats like the aristocratic gangsters in Fritz
Lang's M.
     Alex Proyas wrote the story, co-wrote the screenplay, and directs.
His CROW was a nimble translation of comic book style to the wide
screen.  DARK CITY goes much further in his stylistic experiments.  In
rapid flashes his story piles idea on idea without stopping longer than
a quick muse to think about the implication. The viewer and the
characters is doused in a shower of plot complications and new ideas
with little time to consider them.  As one complains "I have a jigsaw
puzzle in front of me and each time I rearrange the pieces it still
doesn't make any sense."  But as with THE BIG SLEEP, what is most
important is not the understanding of the plot but in the going along
for the ride.  This is a study in mood and texture and a very different
sort of science fiction film from STARSHIP TROOPERS.
     But visually the film is often stunning.  The city has a film
noir-ish feel that fully reflects the title.  Rufus Sewell of COLD
COMFORT FARM and DANGEROUS BEAUTY does not get much chance to register
much emotion besides bewilderment.  He becomes a sort of place-holder
and a cipher in more ways than one.  Keifer Sutherland is a terrific
half-mad scientist who might have been at home in DR. X.  Jennifer
Connelly is terrific in the scenes as a torch singer, but registers the
same lack of depth as Sewell otherwise. William Hurt is a Bogart-like
police inspector with nearly the same style.  Rounding out the cast are
the always enjoyable Richard O'Brien and Ian Richardson as white-faced
aliens.
     This is a film with the texture of nightmare.  It does not pay off
in ways that most films do so it will appeal only to a narrow audience.
But for what it is it is very nicely realized.  It certainly is one of
the most enjoyable surprises of the new year.  I rate it a 7 on the 0
to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     I wonder if I am the only viewer to see strong parallels between
this film and Harlan Ellison's OUTER LIMITS episode "The Demon with a
Glass Hand."  (I rather suspect that Ellison will.  But then he managed
to convince a jury that TERMINATOR borrowed from his "Soldier from
Tomorrow" story rather than the more obvious choice of the science
fiction film CYBORG 2087.)

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
There are movies that are carried completely on the weight of character
development and interaction (WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE?), and there are
movies completely carried by brilliant special effects (INDEPENDENCE DAY).
When the two actually collide (CONTACT), it is a rare masterpiece. DARK CITY
is a visual movie with a very intriguing idea - unfortunately this city is so
dark, the idea can't see where it's going.
Imagine waking up one day, your memory altogether erased and a dead prostitute
in your room. Like a Dr. Jekyll & Mr. Hyde story, DARK CITY begins with such a
premise as John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) awakens in a dingy bathtub with no
recollection of how he got there. Although John can not remember his own
identity, there are several people who do seem to know he is. For one, there
is the police, in particular, Inspector Frank Bumstead (William Hurt) who
oversees the case of mysterious murders for which John is the main suspect.
Secondly, there is John's wife, Emma (Jennifer Connelly), a lounge singer
who's affair supposedly drove John away. Thirdly, there is the mad scientist
like Dr. Daniel Poe Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland), a man whose intentions are
as ambiguous as the time of day (which in "Dark City" is *very* uncertain).
Last but not least, we have a group of bald stark-white guys in black attire
known by names such as Mr. Hand, Mr. Sleep, Mr. Quick, Mr. Wall, etc. Note:
even though they're all bald, there isn't a Mr. Clean.
As things very tediously slowly unravel, we discover that these "men", simply
known as "strangers", have been putting the entire world to sleep every time
the clock strikes midnight. They then proceed to use supernatural powers they
refer to as "tuning" to reshape the city. By joint concentration, the group of
non-human beings are able to construct elaborate apartment buildings in a
matter of seconds, but when everyone awakes from their frozen state, nobody
seems to notice the world around them has transformed into a new, seemingly
unrecognizable environment. John becomes the exception to the rule, never
falling under the sleeping spell and fully aware that the city is anything but
natural. He also has the ability to tune, something he isn't fully aware of
but something the "strangers" find very threatening to their ascendancy. With
everyone seemingly against him, John finds himself on the run from a darkly
transcendental and claustrophobic realm.
Discovering this fact alone takes way too much time. For a very long while,
the audience is left completely in the dark (pun intended) about any sort of
plot. We follow John around the city, watching bizarre occurrences take place
around him as though they were common everyday circumstances. However, this is
true in Dark City, where everybody's heard of Shell Beach but nobody knows how
to get there, and the sun is in everybody's memories but hauntingly never
present in present time. It sounds highly intriguing, and had the audience
been introduced to the "why" questions without dallying so long on the "what"
questions, DARK CITY could've made for a richly absorbent piece of gothic-
psychological thriller-sci-fi. Had director / co-writer Alex Proyas bothered
to delve as deep into John's psychosis as he did the futuristically macabre
imagery, the result would've been an intense and innovative mind trip. Sadly,
without character development or the slightest attempt to lure the audience in
(instead of just confusing us endlessly), such a grand project was never
realized.
Hurt's not looking up this year with such dreary performances in this and LOST
IN SPACE, but at least here his heavily subdued toning blends right in. Sewell
and Connelly are also inordinately ordinary, and Sutherland's Igor impression
is highly laughable, though never intentionally so. In the drab settings, a
lesser ebullience can be expected, but when performances become lethargic, it
is very hard to remain interested. Proyas, whose THE CROW has developed
somewhat of a cult following, is trying to be too artistically trippy, and
there seems to be a lost, deep meaning about humanity that wants to come thru
but never does surface. Any attempts at "real" substance fail embarrassingly.
With so much potential packed into such a misguided film, one must give DARK
CITY two stars for effort, but a big thumbs down on the recommendation level.

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
In grand pulp tradition, a man (Sewell) wakes up amnesiac in a hotel 
room with a dead woman.  Terrified he flees into the shadowy city, 
pursued by a puzzled cop (Hurt), his supposed wife (Connelly) and a 
group of mysterious figures cloaked in black, none of whom have 
Australian accents.  There's a deranged doctor (Sutherland) in there 
too.
The pursued amnesiac murderer is an oldie but a goodie, a hook around 
which one could build a tight and twisty plot.  But that's not what 
happens here.  The most mysterious thing about "Dark City", is why the 
plot starts shrouded in such mystery and then so easily gives up its 
secrets to lumber into a comic book action plot.  Was this intentional 
or has the writer and director (Alex "The Crow" Proyas) misjudged his 
audience?  I suspect the second, but let's look at the good things 
first.  (As always with mystery films, one must speak elliptically on 
certain plot points so as to preserve the surprise for viewers - even 
if the filmmakers don't find the surprise useful.)
>From the opening scenes, Proyas' visual style draws you in.  Our hero 
awakes in a bathtub, the camera drinking in a lazily swinging naked 
lightbulb, a syringe loose on an intricately tiled floor, a bundle of 
clothes folded loosely on a chair.  Later, we move through the 
Escher-like streets of the city to where a singer sways slowly in 
front of a microphone as her band plays in the darkness just outside 
the spotlight.  The dark city itself is a kind of painting, a 
composition carefully constructed for each shot.  Indeed, the actors 
do not so much move through each scene as just stand carefully within 
them.  Movement would disrupt the careful placement and so characters 
are more part of the scenery than part of the plot.
Although this objectifying of the cast is often bad, within "Dark 
City" it works.  William Hurt as the laconic police lieutenant is 
playing little more than a cliche, but this cliche belongs here and is 
done very well.  Likewise, Jennifer Connelly's role could best be 
described as "The Girl" and wouldn't go astray in dozens of other 
movies.  Nor does it go astray here.  Kiefer Sutherland, who was 
nearly due for lifetime membership in the Bad Movie Actors Guild 
(whether you read it as "BAD movie ACTORS" or "BAD MOVIE actors") here 
turns a surprisingly good job as the oddly pathetic collaborator Dr 
Schreber, struggling pathetically against his controllers.
But this returns us to the plot.  The sad fact is that the mystery is 
all but over 40 minutes into the film, leaving nothing but the visual 
style.  After the teasing open scene, the director is in a tearing 
hurry to explain it all to us, with a disastrous opening monologue 
which all but tells you what's going on.  (Even one of the poster 
blurbs gives the secret away.)  So by the halfway mark, the battle 
lines are drawn and all that remains is for our hero to go mano a mano 
with the bad guys.  And you don't seriously think that he's going to 
lose, do you?  This is mighty little to hang the rest of the film on.  
Actually it's surprising that Dark City works as well as it does given 
that thinness of its plot.  Some viewers might complain that "Dark 
City" is illogical.  Given the immense levels of technology and powers 
dealt with, it's more "a-logical".  Anything could happen.  It's more 
fantasy than science-fiction.  This tends to underline the 
arbitrariness and lack of mystery.
"Dark City" is thus a bit of a mixed bag, the product of a single 
person's vision that perhaps needed some tempering by an outside point 
of view to bring it to full fruition.  However, just on the basis of 
the first half and visuals I'd rate it [***/interesting] and Peter 
Greenaway on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"Dark City" (aka "Dark Empire", "Dark World")
Released 1998.
Director and writer Alex Proyas.
Starring Rufus Sewell, Jennifer Connelly, William Hurt, Ian 
        Richardson, Kiefer Sutherland, Bruce Spence, Richard O'Brien, Colin 
        Friels, John Bluthal, Melissa George.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Dept. Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Author
James Brundage
Written by Alex Proyas, Lem Dobbs, and David S. Goyer
Staring Rufus Sewell, Jennifer Connelly, Kiefer Sutherland, William Hurt,
Ian Richardson, and Richard O'Brien.
     This is the fifth time I have watched Dark City.  Four times I have
watched it on video rentals, the fifth time I watched it on a DVD, the
format that I've been hearing good things about for several months now.  I
paid $24.99 to buy the DVD, about $10-$15 more than I would have spent on a
videocassette.  As far as format goes, it was worth it.  From frame one,
picture is deeper and sound is clearer.  Well, enough about telling the
world about the Dark City DVD - a vast enhancement over the VHS version -
let's talk about the movie Dark City.
     Dark City is about, well, a dark city.  It is dark on the psychological
level: the world presented in front of you is one of prostitutes, serial
killers, and things that go bump in the night.  It is also dark on the
physical level: no one can remember clearly the last time they saw the light
of day.  As far as the darkness of the film itself: it is a devastatingly
beautiful film noir, filled with all the jazz and mystery that we have come
to expect from the incredibly interesting style of filmmaking.
     Alex Proyas' first cinematic effort since the tragic death of Brandon
Lee on the set of The Crow, this presents us with a radically different
world than the shoot-em-up that The Crow was.  In Dark City, we follow John
Murdoch (Rufus Sewell), a man with scant memories and the ability to Tune,
or alter physical reality with his mind.  Murdoch awakes at midnight in a
city where time seems to stop for several hours.  He is in a hotel room with
a bloody knife and the dead body of a prostitute.  On his trial are a race
of beings called "The Strangers", who also posses this telekinetic ability.
 The Strangers are a dying race that controls Dark City, replacing people's
memories in order to discern what makes a person human.  They are, in their
own way, searching for the soul.
     Murdoch does soul-searching of his own, trying to find who he was, or
was supposed to be.  Desperately trying to evade the psychotic and utterly
terrifying Strangers.  Dr. Daniel Poe Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland) is trying
to aid him, trying to help him understand an ability that he can hardly
fathom, while at the same time being forced by the Strangers to help them in
their zoo of humanity.  Emma Murdoch (Jennifer Connelly), his wife, is a
jazz singer utterly convinced that her husband is innocent.  Inspector
Bumstead (William Hurt) is the cop trying to make sense of a crime that
leads to a conspiracy more complex than the JFK assassination.
     Dark City is propelled forward at the speed of a Tokyo bullet train
thanks to one of the most original plots and screenplays in ages, the first
in a pattern of cross-genre works (this one sci-fi, Mystery, and Film Noir)
that had among its newest members the excellent action film The Matrix.  The
ferocious pace displayed in the movie grabs everyone at frame one and keeps
them until the end, and kicks the suspense in with a wonderful score and a
terrific jazz and techno soundtrack.
     It is a foray into the surreal: let you be warned about that.  However,
unlike most ambiguous and surreal movies, such as Lynch's Lost Highway, it
gives you answers in a way that you can understand.  Not only does it give
you answers in an easy to understand format, but it compels you with
characters that you like, that you find unique.  It is careful not to put
you a step ahead or behind Murdoch as he unravels the mystery of Dark City,
as he tries to escape from the bizarre and frightening world that constantly
surrounds him.
     See it, sci-fi fans.  See it, those who liked The Crow.  See it,
friends of mystery and of film noir.  Hell, if your just someone tired of
the same-old, same-old that Hollywood dishes out, see it.  But, any way you
cut it, see this movie.
